EN
FR
DE
IT
ES
PT
JA
ZH
UK
RU
BeLight Software Privacy Statement
Your privacy is important to us. This Privacy Statement covers how we collect, use, disclose, transfer and store your information.
Collection and Use of Personal Information
Personal information is data that can be used to identify or contact a single person.
You may be asked to provide your personal information any time you are in contact with BeLight Software. We may share and use this information consistent with this Privacy Statement. We may also combine it with other information to provide and improve our products, services, content and advertising. You are not required to provide the personal information that we have requested, but, if you choose not to do so, in many cases, we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to any queries you may have.
What personal information we collect:
When you purchase a product, download software or an update, register for company or product newsletters, contact us or participate in an online survey, we may collect a variety of information, including your name, mailing address, phone number and email address.
How we use your personal information:
The personal information we collect allows us to keep you posted on BeLight Software’s latest product announcements, software updates and upcoming events. If you don’t want to be on our mailing list, you can opt out any time by emailing us at:
news@belightsoft.com
We also use personal information to help us create, develop, operate, deliver and improve upon our products, services, content and advertising, as well as for loss prevention purposes.
We may use your personal information to verify identity, assist with identification of users and determine appropriate services.
From time to time, we may use your personal information to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with BeLight Software, you may not opt out of receiving these communications.
We may also use personal information for internal purposes, such as auditing, data analysis and research to improve BeLight Software products, services and customer communications.
If you enter into a sweepstakes, contest or similar promotion, we may use the information you provide to administer those programs.
Collection and Use of Non-personal Information
We may also collect data in a form that does not, on its own, permit direct association with any specific individual. We may collect, use, transfer and disclose non-personal information for any purpose. The following are some examples of non-personal information that we collect and how we may use it:
We may collect information such as occupation, language, zip code, area code, unique device identifier, referrer URL, location and the time zone where a BeLight Software product is used so that we can better understand customer behavior and improve our products, services and advertising.
We may collect information regarding customer activities on our websites and from our other products and services. This information is aggregated and used to help us provide more useful information to our customers and to understand which parts of our website, products and services are of most interest. Aggregated data is considered non-personal information for the purposes of this Privacy Statement.
With your permission only, we may collect information and statistics about software usage and user behavior while using the software. We will use this data internally to understand how to improve our software and user experience. At any time, you can recall the permission to collect software usage statistics via the app settings on iOS/iPadOS, and via the app preferences on macOS. (No software usage statistics is collected on Windows and Android.)
If we do combine non-personal information with personal information, the combined information will be treated as personal information for as long as it remains combined.
Cookies and Other Technologies
BeLight Software websites, online services, interactive applications, email messages and advertisements may use "cookies" and other technologies, such as pixel tags and web beacons. These technologies help us better understand user behavior, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. We treat information collected by cookies and other technologies as non-personal information. However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal information by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal information. Similarly, to the extent that non-personal information is combined with personal information, we treat the combined information as personal information for the purposes of this Privacy Statement.
If you want to disable cookies, and you’re using the Safari web browser, go to Safari Preferences and then to the Privacy pane to manage your preferences. For other browsers, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Please note that certain features of the BeLight Software website will not be available once cookies are disabled.
As is true of most internet services, we gather some information automatically and store it in log files. This information includes Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, browser type and language, Internet service provider (ISP), referring and exit websites and applications, operating system, date/time stamp, and clickstream data.
We use this information to understand and analyze trends, to administer the site, to learn about user behavior on the site, to improve our product and services and to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole. BeLight Software may use this information in our marketing and advertising services.
In some of our email messages, we use a “click-through URL” linked to content on the BeLight Software website. When customers click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate web server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through data to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure the effectiveness of our customer communications. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click text or graphic links in the email messages. Pixel tags enable us to send email messages in a format customers can read, and they tell us whether mail has been opened. We may use this information to reduce or eliminate messages sent to customers.
Disclosure to Third Parties
At times, BeLight Software may make certain personal information available to strategic partners that work with BeLight Software to provide products and services or that help BeLight Software market to customers. Personal information will only be shared by BeLight Software to provide or improve our products, services and advertising; it will not be shared with third parties for their marketing purposes.
Service Providers
BeLight Software shares personal information with companies that provide services such as information processing, fulfilling customer orders, delivering products to you, managing and enhancing customer data, providing customer service, assessing your interest in our products and services and conducting customer research or satisfaction surveys. These companies are obligated to protect your information.
Services we use and their respective privacy policies:
Google Analytics is used to analyze website visitors’ behavior and activity:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube is used for video content playback:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo is used for video content playback:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring is used for online order processing:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle is used for online order processing:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius is used to track sales generated by websites that sends affiliate traffic to our products:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Trimble 3D Warehouse service is used to provide users access to online storage of 3D models:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
YouTube API Services are used for uploading walkthrough videos to YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev is used as a solution to collect and analyze user behavior within software:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Others
It may be necessary—by law, legal process, litigation and/or requests from public and governmental authorities within or outside your country of residence — for BeLight Software to disclose your personal information. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or protect our operations or users. Additionally, in the event of a reorganization, merger or sale, we may transfer any and all personal information we collect to the relevant third party.
Protection of Personal Information
BeLight Software takes the security of your personal information very seriously. BeLight Software online services, such as the BeLight Software website store and embedded into software store, protect your personal information during transit using encryption such as Transport Layer Security (TLS). When your personal data is stored by BeLight Software, we use computer systems with limited access and encrypted storage.
When you use some BeLight Software products, services or applications, or post on a BeLight Software forum, chat room or social networking service, the personal information and content you share is visible to other users and can be read, collected or used by them. In these instances, you are responsible for the personal information you choose to share or submit.
Integrity and Retention of Personal Information
BeLight Software will retain your personal information for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Statement unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law.
Access to Personal Information
Access, correction or deletion requests can be made via email at:
info@belightsoft.com
Children
If we learn that we have collected the personal information of a child under 13, or equivalent minimum age depending on jurisdiction, we will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible.
Parents can contact us via email at:
info@belightsoft.com
Third-party Sites and Services
BeLight Software websites, products, applications and services may contain links to third-party websites, products and services. Our products and services may also use or offer products or services from third parties. Information collected by third parties, which may include such things as location data or contact details, is governed by their privacy practices. We encourage you to learn about the privacy practices of those third parties.
Commitment to Your Privacy
To ensure that your personal information is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to BeLight Software employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
Questions
If you have any questions or concerns about the BeLight Software Privacy Statement or data processing, or if you would like to make a complaint about a possible breach of local privacy laws, please contact us at:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software may update its Privacy Statement from time to time. When we change the policy in a material way, a notice will be posted on our website along with the updated Privacy Statement.
Déclaration de confidentialité de BeLight Software
La confidentialité de vos informations est importante pour nous. La présente Déclaration de confidentialité explique comment nous collectons, utilisons, divulguons, transférons et stockons vos informations.
Collecte et utilisation d’informations personnelles
Les informations personnelles sont des données pouvant être utilisées pour identifier ou contacter une personne.
Il est possible que l’on vous demande des informations personnelles lorsque vous êtes en contact avec BeLight Software. Nous pouvons partager et utiliser ces informations conformément à la présente Déclaration de confidentialité. Nous pouvons également les combiner avec d’autres informations afin de fournir et d’améliorer nos produits, services, contenus et publicité. Vous n’êtes pas obligé(e) de fournir les informations personnelles que nous vous demandons, mais, si vous décidez de ne pas le faire, dans de nombreux cas nous ne pourrons pas vous fournir nos produits ou services ni répondre à vos demandes éventuelles.
Nous collectons les informations personnelles suivantes :
Lorsque vous achetez un produit, téléchargez un logiciel ou une mise à jour, vous abonnez au bulletin d’information de l’entreprise ou d’un produit, nous contactez ou participez à une enquête en ligne, nous pouvons collecter diverses informations, y compris votre nom, adresse postale, numéro de téléphone et adresse e-mail.
Nous utilisons vos informations personnelles comme suit :
Les informations personnelles que nous collectons nous permettent de vous tenir informé(e) des dernières annonces de produits, des mises à jour logicielles et des événements à venir. Si vous ne voulez pas figurer dans notre liste de diffusion, vous pouvez vous désinscrire à tout moment en nous envoyant un e-mail à l’adresse :
news@belightsoft.com
Nous utilisons également des informations personnelles afin de nous aider à créer, développer, opérer, fournir et améliorer nos produits, services, contenus et publicité, et à des fins de prévention des pertes.
Nous pouvons utiliser vos informations personnelles pour vérifier l’identité, aider à identifier des utilisateurs et pour déterminer les services appropriés.
Nous pouvons parfois utiliser vos informations personnelles pour envoyer des notifications importantes, comme des communications sur des achats et des changements de nos conditions et politiques. Ces informations étant importantes pour votre interaction avec BeLight Software, vous ne pouvez pas choisir de ne pas recevoir ces communications.
Nous pouvons également utiliser des informations personnelles à des fins internes comme l’audit, l’analyse de données et la recherche afin d’améliorer les produits, les services et les communications de BeLight Software à ses clients.
Si vous participez à un tirage au sort, un concours ou une promotion similaire, nous pouvons utiliser les informations que vous fournissez pour administrer ces programmes.
Collecte et utilisation d’informations non personnelles
Nous pouvons collectons également des données sous une forme qui ne permet pas, à elle seule, de les associer directement à une personne en particulier. Nous pouvons collecter, utiliser, transférer et divulguer des informations non personnelles pour quelque fin que ce soit. Voici quelques exemples d’informations non personnelles que nous collectons et comment nous pouvons les utiliser :
Nous pouvons collecter des informations comme la profession, la langue, le code postal, le code de zone, l’identifiant unique de l’appareil, l’URL de référence, la localisation et le fuseau horaire où un produit BeLight Software est utilisé afin de mieux comprendre le comportement des clients et améliorer nos produits, services et publicité.
Nous pouvons collecter des informations sur les activités des clients sur nos sites Web et depuis nos autres produits et services. Ces informations sont regroupées et utilisées pour nous aider à fournir des informations plus utiles à nos clients et pour connaître les parties de notre site Web et de nos produits et services qui les intéressent le plus. Les données regroupées sont considérées comme des informations non personnelles aux fins de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité.
Avec votre autorisation, nous pouvons collecter des informations et des statistiques sur l’utilisation du logiciel et le comportement de l’utilisateur pendant l’utilisation du logiciel. Nous utiliserons ces données en interne pour comprendre comment améliorer notre logiciel et l’expérience des utilisateurs. Vous pouvez à tout moment annuler l’autorisation de collecte de statistiques sur l’utilisation du logiciel via les réglages de l’application sur iOS/iPadOS et les préférences de l’application sur macOS. (Aucune statistique d'utilisation du logiciel n'est recueillie sous Windows et Android.)
Si nous combinons des informations non personnelles avec des informations personnelles, les informations combinées seront traitées comme des informations personnelles tant que celles-ci resteront combinées.
Cookies et autres technologies
Les sites Web, services en ligne, applications interactives, e-mails et publicités de BeLight Software peuvent utiliser des « cookies » et d’autres technologies comme des tags de pixel et des balises Web. Ces technologies nous aident à mieux comprendre le comportement des utilisateurs, nous indiquent les parties de nos sites Web ayant été visitées, et facilitent et mesurent l’efficacité des publicités et des recherches Web. Nous traitons les informations collectées par les cookies et les autres technologies comme des informations non personnelles. Toutefois, dans la mesure où les adresses IP (protocole Internet) ou d’autres identifiants similaires sont considérés comme des informations personnelles par la législation locale, nous traitons également ces identifiants comme des informations personnelles. De même, dans la mesure où des informations non personnelles sont combinées avec des informations personnelles, nous traitons les informations combinées comme des informations personnelles aux fins de la présente Déclaration de confidentialité.
Si vous voulez désactiver les cookies et que vous utilisez le navigateur Web Safari, rendez-vous dans les préférences de Safari, puis dans le volet de confidentialité pour gérer vos préférences. Pour les autres navigateurs, consultez votre fournisseur pour savoir comment désactiver les cookies. Veuillez noter que certains éléments du site Web de BeLight Software ne seront plus disponibles une fois les cookies désactivés.
Comme c’est le cas de la plupart des services Internet, nous recueillons automatiquement des informations et les stockons dans des fichiers journaux. Ces informations incluent l’adresse IP (protocole Internet), le type de navigateur et la langue, le fournisseur de services Internet (FSI), les sites Web et les applications de référence et de sortie, le système d’exploitation, l’horodatage et les données de parcours de navigation.
Nous utilisons ces informations pour comprendre et analyser des tendances, administrer le site, mieux connaître le comportement des utilisateurs sur le site, améliorer nos produits et services, et collecter des informations démographiques sur l’ensemble de notre base d’utilisateurs. Nous pouvons utiliser ces informations dans nos services de marketing et de publicité de BeLight Software.
Dans certains de nos e-mails, nous utilisons une « URL de clic publicitaire » liée à du contenu du site Web de BeLight Software. Lorsque les clients cliquent sur l’une de ces URL, ils passent par un serveur Web séparé avant d’arriver sur la page de destination sur notre site Web. Nous pistons ces données de « clic publicitaire » afin de nous aider à déterminer l’intérêt sur des sujets spécifiques et mesurer l’efficacité de nos communications avec nos clients. Si vous préférez ne pas être pisté de la sorte, vous ne devez pas cliquer sur des liens de texte ou graphiques dans les e-mails. Les tags de pixel nous permettent d’envoyer des e-mails dans un format pouvant être lu par les clients et nous indiquent si l’e-mail a été ouvert. Nous pouvons utiliser ces informations pour réduire ou supprimer les messages envoyés aux clients.
Divulgation à des tiers
BeLight Software peut parfois mettre certaines informations personnelles à la disposition de partenaires stratégiques qui travaillent avec BeLight Software pour fournir des produits et des services ou qui aident BeLight Software à des fins de marketing. Les informations personnelles seront uniquement partagées par BeLight Software pour fournir ou améliorer nos produits, services et publicité ; elles ne seront pas partagées avec des tiers aux fins de marketing desdits tiers.
Fournisseurs de services
BeLight Software partage des informations personnelles avec des entreprises qui fournissent des services tels que le traitement d’informations, l’exécution des commandes clients, la fourniture de produits à vous-même, la gestion et l’amélioration des données clients, la fourniture de service client, l’évaluation de votre intérêt pour nos produits et services, et la réalisation d’études sur les clients et d’enquêtes de satisfaction. Ces entreprises sont tenues de protéger vos informations.
Services utilisés et politiques de confidentialité correspondantes :
Google Analytics est utilisé pour analyser l’activité et le comportement des visiteurs du site :
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube est utilisé pour la lecture du contenu vidéo :
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo est utilisé pour la lecture du contenu vidéo :
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring est utilisé pour le traitement des commandes en ligne :
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle est utilisé pour le traitement des commandes en ligne :
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius est utilisé pour suivre les ventes générées par les sites Web qui envoient du trafic affilié vers nos produits :
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Le service Trimble 3D Warehouse est utilisé pour donner aux utilisateurs l’accès à un espace de stockage de modèles 3D en ligne :
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
Les services API de YouTube sont utilisés pour télécharger des visites vidéo sur YouTube :
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev est utilisé en tant que solution de collecte et d’analyse du comportement des utilisateurs dans le logiciel :
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Autres
Il peut s’avérer nécessaire pour BeLight Software de divulguer vos informations personnelles en vertu de la loi, d’une procédure judiciaire, d’un litige et/ou sur demande des autorités publiques et gouvernementales dans ou hors de votre pays de résidence. Nous pouvons également divulguer des informations sur vous si nous déterminons que cela est raisonnablement nécessaire pour faire respecter nos conditions générales ou protéger nos opérations ou nos utilisateurs. En outre, en cas de réorganisation, fusion ou vente, nous pouvons transférer toutes les informations personnelles que nous collectons au tiers concerné.
Protection des informations personnelles
BeLight Software prend très au sérieux la sécurité de vos informations personnelles. Les services en ligne de BeLight Software, comme la boutique du site Web et la boutique intégrée dans le logiciel de BeLight Software, protègent vos informations personnelles en cours de transit grâce à des protocoles de chiffrement comme TLS (sécurité de la couche de transport). Lorsque vos données personnelles sont stockées par BeLight Software, nous utilisons des systèmes informatiques à accès limité et stockage chiffré.
Lorsque vous utilisez des produits, services ou applications BeLight Software ou que vous publiez sur un forum, un salon de discussion ou un service de réseau social de BeLight Software, les informations personnelles et le contenu que vous partagez sont visibles par les autres utilisateurs qui peuvent les lire, les collecter ou les utiliser. Dans ces cas, vous êtes responsable des informations personnelles que vous décidez de partager ou d’envoyer.
Intégrité et conservation d’informations personnelles
BeLight Software conservera vos informations personnelles pendant la durée nécessaire aux fins décrites dans la présente Déclaration de confidentialité à moins qu’une période de conservation plus longue ne soit exigée ou autorisée par la loi.
Accès aux informations personnelles
Les demandes d’accès, de correction ou de suppression peuvent être effectuées par e-mail à l’adresse :
info@belightsoft.com
Enfants
Si nous apprenons que nous avons collecté les informations personnelles d’un enfant de moins de 13 ans, ou d’un âge minimum équivalent selon la juridiction, nous prendrons des mesures afin de supprimer ces informations le plus rapidement possible.
Les parents peuvent nous contacter par e-mail à l’adresse :
info@belightsoft.com
Sites et services tiers
Les sites Web, produits, applications et services de BeLight Software peuvent contenir des liens vers des sites Web, produits et services tiers. Nos produits et services peuvent également utiliser ou proposer des produits ou des services tiers. Les informations collectées par des tiers, pouvant inclure des données de localisation ou des coordonnées de contact, sont régies par leurs pratiques de confidentialité. Nous vous encourageons à vous renseigner sur les pratiques de confidentialité de ces tiers.
Engagement à protéger votre vie privée
Afin de garantir la protection de vos informations personnelles, nous communiquons nos directives de confidentialité et de sécurité aux employés BeLight Software et nous faisons appliquer strictement les mesures de protection de la vie privée au sein de l’entreprise.
Questions
Si vous avez des questions ou des doutes concernant la Déclaration de confidentialité de BeLight Software ou le traitement des données, ou si vous souhaitez présenter une plainte au sujet d’une possible violation des lois locales en matière de confidentialité, veuillez nous contacter à l’adresse :
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software peut mettre à jour sa Déclaration de confidentialité de temps en temps. Lorsque nous changeons de politique de manière matérielle, une notification est publiée sur notre site Web avec la Déclaration de confidentialité mise à jour.
BeLight Software-Datenschutzerklärung
Ihr Datenschutz ist uns wichtig. In dieser Datenschutzerklärung wird beschrieben, wie wir Ihre Daten sammeln, verwenden, offenlegen, übertragen und speichern.
Sammlung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten
Personenbezogene Daten sind Daten, die dazu genutzt werden können, eine einzelne Person zu identifizieren oder zu kontaktieren.
Sie werden eventuell um die Angabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gebeten, wenn Sie mit BeLight Software in Kontakt treten. Wir können diese Daten in Übereinstimmung mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung weitergeben und verwenden. Wir können sie auch mit anderen Daten kombinieren, um unsere Produkte, Dienste, Inhalte und Werbung anzubieten und zu verbessern. Sie sind nicht verpflichtet, die von uns angeforderten personenbezogenen Daten anzugeben, aber wenn Sie dies nicht tun, können wir Ihnen in vielen Fällen unsere Produkte oder Dienste nicht zur Verfügung stellen oder auf Ihre Fragen antworten.
Welche personenbezogenen Daten sammeln wir:
Wenn Sie ein Produkt kaufen, Software oder ein Update herunterladen, sich für Unternehmens- oder Produktnewsletter registrieren, uns kontaktieren oder an einer Onlineumfrage teilnehmen, können wir eine Vielzahl von Daten sammeln, einschließlich Ihres Namens, Ihrer Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse.
So verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten:
Die von uns gesammelten personenbezogenen Daten ermöglichen es uns, Sie über die neuesten Produktankündigungen, Softwareupdates und bevorstehende Veranstaltungen von BeLight Software auf dem Laufenden zu halten. Wenn Sie nicht auf unserer Mailingliste stehen möchten, können Sie sich jederzeit abmelden, indem Sie uns eine E-Mail senden:
news@belightsoft.com
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten auch, um unsere Produkte, Dienste, Inhalte und Werbung zu erstellen, zu entwickeln, zu betreiben, zu liefern und zu verbessern. Sie werden außerdem zur Vermeidung von Verlusten eingesetzt.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um die Identität zu überprüfen, bei der Identifizierung von Benutzern zu helfen und um geeignete Dienste zu ermitteln.
Von Zeit zu Zeit können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um wichtige Mitteilungen zu versenden, wie z. B. Mitteilungen über Käufe und Änderungen unserer Geschäftsbedingungen und Richtlinien. Da diese Informationen für Ihre Interaktion mit BeLight Software wichtig sind, können Sie den Erhalt dieser Mitteilungen möglicherweise nicht ablehnen.
Wir können personenbezogene Daten auch für interne Zwecke wie Auditing, Datenanalyse und Forschung zur Verbesserung von BeLight Software-Produkten, -Diensten und Kundenkommunikation verwenden.
Wenn Sie an einer Verlosung, einem Wettbewerb oder einer ähnlichen Werbeaktion teilnehmen, können wir die von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellten Daten zur Verwaltung dieser Programme verwenden.
Sammlung und Verwendung nicht personenbezogener Daten
Wir sammeln auch Daten in einer Form, die allein keine direkte Verbindung zu einer bestimmten Person zulässt. Wir können nicht personenbezogene Daten für jeden Zweck sammeln, verwenden, übertragen und offenlegen. Im Folgenden finden Sie einige Beispiele für nicht personenbezogene Daten, die wir sammeln und wie wir sie verwenden können:
Wir sammeln möglicherweise auch Daten wie Beruf, Sprache, Postleitzahl, Vorwahl, eindeutige Gerätekennung, Referrer-URL, Standort und Zeitzone, in der ein BeLight Software-Produkt verwendet wird, damit wir das Kundenverhalten besser verstehen und unsere Produkte, Dienste und Werbung verbessern können.
Wir können Daten über Kundenaktivitäten auf unseren Websites und von unseren anderen Produkten und Diensten sammeln. Diese Daten werden aggregiert und verwendet, um unseren Kunden mehr nützliche Informationen zur Verfügung zu stellen und um zu verstehen, welche Teile unserer Website, Produkte und Dienste von größtem Interesse sind. Aggregierte Daten gelten als nicht personenbezogene Daten für die Zwecke dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Mit Ihrer Erlaubnis können wir Informationen und Statistiken über die Softwarenutzung und das Nutzerverhalten bei der Verwendung der Software sammeln. Wir werden diese Daten intern verwenden, um zu verstehen, wie wir unsere Software und die Benutzererfahrung verbessern können. Sie können die Erlaubnis zum Sammeln von Software-Nutzungsstatistiken jederzeit über die App-Einstellungen unter iOS/iPadOS und die Programmeinstellungen unter macOS widerrufen. (Unter Windows und Android werden keine Software-Nutzungsstatistiken erfasst.)
Wenn wir nicht personenbezogene Daten mit personenbezogenen Daten kombinieren, werden die kombinierten Daten als personenbezogene Daten behandelt, solange sie kombiniert bleiben.
Cookies und andere Technologien
Websites, Onlinedienste, interaktive Programme, E-Mail-Nachrichten und Werbung von BeLight Software können „Cookies“ und andere Technologien wie Pixel-Tags und Webbeacons verwenden. Diese Technologien helfen uns, das Nutzerverhalten besser zu verstehen, sagen uns, welche Teile unserer Websites von Menschen besucht wurden, und erleichtern und messen die Effektivität von Werbung und Websuche. Wir behandeln Daten, die durch Cookies und andere Technologien gesammelt werden, als nicht personenbezogene Daten. Soweit Internet Protocol (IP)-Adressen oder ähnliche Bezeichner nach lokalem Recht als personenbezogene Daten gelten, behandeln wir diese Bezeichner auch als personenbezogene Daten. In dem Maße, in dem nicht personenbezogene Daten mit personenbezogenen Daten kombiniert werden, behandeln wir die kombinierten Daten als personenbezogene Daten für die Zwecke dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Wenn Sie Cookies deaktivieren möchten und den Safari-Webbrowser verwenden, gehen Sie zu den Safari-Einstellungen und dann zum Bereich „Datenschutz“, um Ihre Einstellungen zu verwalten. Bei anderen Browsern erkundigen Sie sich bei Ihrem Provider, wie Sie Cookies deaktivieren können. Bitte beachten Sie, dass bestimmte Funktionen der BeLight Software-Website nicht verfügbar sind, sobald Cookies deaktiviert sind.
Wie bei den meisten Internetdiensten sammeln wir einige Daten automatisch und speichern sie in Protokolldateien. Zu diesen Daten gehören Internet Protocol (IP)-Adressen, Browsertyp und -sprache, Internetanbieter (ISP), verweisende und verlassene Websites sowie Programme, Betriebssystem, Datums-/Zeitstempel und Clickstream-Daten.
Wir verwenden diese Daten, um Trends zu verstehen und zu analysieren, die Website zu verwalten, das Nutzerverhalten auf der Website kennenzulernen, unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verbessern und demografische Daten über unsere Nutzerbasis als Ganzes zu sammeln. BeLight Software kann diese Daten in unseren Marketing- und Werbeservices verwenden.
In einigen unserer E-Mail-Nachrichten verwenden wir eine Durchklick-URL, die mit Inhalten auf der BeLight Software-Website verknüpft ist. Wenn Kunden auf eine dieser URLs klicken, durchlaufen sie einen separaten Webserver, bevor sie auf die Zielseite auf unserer Website gelangen. Wir verfolgen diese Durchklickdaten, um das Interesse an bestimmten Themen zu ermitteln und die Effektivität unserer Kundenkommunikation zu messen. Wenn Sie nicht auf diese Weise verfolgt werden möchten, sollten Sie nicht auf Text- oder Grafiklinks in den E-Mail-Nachrichten klicken. Pixel-Tags ermöglichen es uns, E-Mail-Nachrichten in einem Format zu versenden, das Kunden lesen können, und sie sagen uns, ob die E-Mail geöffnet wurde. Wir können diese Daten verwenden, um Mitteilungen an Kunden zu reduzieren oder zu löschen.
Offenlegung an Dritte
Gelegentlich stellt BeLight Software bestimmte personenbezogene Daten strategischen Partnern zur Verfügung, die mit BeLight Software zusammenarbeiten, um Produkte und Dienste bereitzustellen, oder die BeLight Software bei der Vermarktung beim Kunden helfen. Personenbezogene Daten werden von BeLight Software nur zur Bereitstellung oder Verbesserung unserer Produkte, Dienste und Werbung weitergegeben; sie werden nicht an Dritte für deren Marketingzwecke weitergegeben.
Dienstanbieter
BeLight Software gibt personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen weiter, die Services wie Informationsverarbeitung, Ausführung von Kundenbestellungen, Lieferung von Produkten an Sie, Verwaltung und Verbesserung von Kundendaten, Bereitstellung von Kundenservice, Bewertung Ihres Interesses an unseren Produkten und Diensten sowie Durchführung von Kundenbefragungen oder Zufriedenheitsumfragen anbieten. Diese Unternehmen sind verpflichtet, Ihre Daten zu schützen.
Die von uns genutzten Dienste und ihre jeweiligen Datenschutzrichtlinien:
Mit Google Analytics wird das Verhalten und die Aktivität von Websitebesuchern analysiert:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Mit YouTube werden Videoinhalte wiedergegeben:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Mit Vimeo werden Videoinhalte wiedergegeben:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
Mit FastSpring werden Online-Bestellungen abgewickelt:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Mit Paddle werden Online-Bestellungen abgewickelt:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
Devtodev wird als Lösung zur Erfassung und Analyse des Nutzerverhaltens innerhalb der Software verwendet:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
ImpactRadius wird verwendet, um Verkäufe zu verfolgen, die von Websites generiert werden, die Affiliate-Traffic zu unseren Produkten senden:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
Mit dem Trimble 3D Warehouse-Dienst wird Benutzern Zugriff auf online gespeicherte 3D-Modelle bereitgestellt:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Die YouTube-API-Dienste werden für das Hochladen von Rundgangvideos auf YouTube verwendet:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Sonstiges
Es kann erforderlich sein, dass BeLight Software Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aufgrund von Gesetzen, Gerichtsverfahren, Rechtsstreitigkeiten und/oder Anfragen von öffentlichen und staatlichen Behörden innerhalb oder außerhalb Ihres Landes, in dem Sie Ihren Wohnsitz haben, offenlegt. Wir können auch Daten über Sie offenlegen, wenn wir der Ansicht sind, dass die Offenlegung zur Durchsetzung unserer Geschäftsbedingungen oder zum Schutz unserer Geschäftstätigkeiten oder Benutzer erforderlich ist. Darüber hinaus können wir im Falle einer Reorganisation, Fusion oder eines Verkaufs alle personenbezogenen Daten, die wir sammeln, an den entsprechenden Dritten weitergeben.
Schutz personenbezogener Daten
BeLight Software nimmt die Sicherheit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sehr ernst. BeLight Software-Onlinedienste wie der BeLight Software-Website-Store und der in die Software eingebettete Store schützen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten während der Übertragung durch Verschlüsselungsprotokolle wie TLS (Transport Layer Security). Wenn Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von BeLight Software gespeichert werden, verwenden wir Computersysteme mit eingeschränktem Zugriff und verschlüsseltem Speicher.
Wenn Sie einige BeLight Software-Produkte, -Dienste oder -Programme verwenden oder in einem Forum, Chatroom oder Social-Networking-Dienst von BeLight Software posten, sind die von Ihnen geteilten personenbezogenen Daten und Inhalte für andere Benutzer sichtbar und können von ihnen gelesen, gesammelt oder verwendet werden. In diesen Fällen sind Sie für die personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich, die Sie teilen oder übermitteln.
Integrität und Aufbewahrung personenbezogener Daten
BeLight Software speichert Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für den Zeitraum, der erforderlich ist, um die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung genannten Zwecke zu erfüllen, es sei denn, eine längere Aufbewahrungsfrist ist gesetzlich vorgeschrieben oder erlaubt.
Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten
Zugriffs-, Korrektur- oder Löschanfragen können per E-Mail gestellt werden an:
info@belightsoft.com
Kinder
Wenn wir erfahren, dass wir die personenbezogenen Daten eines Kindes unter 13 Jahren oder eines gleichwertigen Mindestalters je nach Gerichtsbarkeit gesammelt haben, werden wir Maßnahmen ergreifen, um die Daten so schnell wie möglich zu löschen.
Eltern können uns per E-Mail kontaktieren unter:
info@belightsoft.com
Websites und Dienste Dritter
Websites, Produkte, Programme und Dienste von BeLight Software können Links zu Websites, Produkten und Diensten Dritter enthalten. Unsere Produkte und Dienste können auch Produkte oder Dienste von Dritten nutzen oder anbieten. Die von Dritten gesammelten Daten, zu denen beispielsweise Standortdaten oder Kontaktdaten gehören können, unterliegen deren Datenschutzpraktiken. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, sich über die Datenschutzpraktiken dieser Dritten zu informieren.
Bekenntnis zum Datenschutz
Um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten sicher sind, kommunizieren wir unsere Datenschutz- und Sicherheitsrichtlinien an BeLight Software-Mitarbeiter und setzen die Datenschutzmechanismen innerhalb des Unternehmens strikt durch.
Fragen
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Bedenken bezüglich der BeLight Software-Datenschutzerklärung oder der Datenverarbeitung haben oder eine Beschwerde über einen möglichen Verstoß gegen lokale Datenschutzgesetze einreichen möchten, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software kann seine Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren. Wenn wir die Richtlinie in einer wesentlichen Weise ändern, wird ein Hinweis auf unserer Website zusammen mit der aktualisierten Datenschutzerklärung veröffentlicht.
Informativa sulla privacy di BeLight Software
La privacy degli utenti è di estrema importanza per noi. La presente Informativa sulla privacy illustra la modalità di raccolta, utilizzo, divulgazione, trasferimento e archiviazione delle informazioni degli utenti.
Raccolta e uso delle informazioni personali
Per informazioni personali si intendono i dati che possono essere utilizzati per identificare o contattare una singola persona.
Potremmo chiedere agli utenti di fornire le proprie informazioni personali in qualsiasi momento essi vengano in contatto con BeLight Software. Potremmo condividere e utilizzare tali informazioni in conformità con quanto descritto nella presente Informativa sulla privacy. Potremmo inoltre combinare tali informazioni con altri dati per fornire e migliorare i nostri prodotti, servizi, contenuti e materiali pubblicitari. All’utente non è fatto obbligo di fornire le informazioni personali richieste ma, se sceglie di non fornirle, in molti casi potremmo non essere in grado di fornire i nostri prodotti o servizi o di rispondere a eventuali richieste.
Informazioni personali raccolte:
Potremmo raccogliere diverse informazioni (tra cui nome, indirizzo postale, numero di telefono e indirizzo e-mail) quando l’utente acquista un prodotto, scarica un software o un aggiornamento, si registra alle newsletter della società o del prodotto, ci contatta o partecipa a un sondaggio online.
Come vengono utilizzate le informazioni personali:
Le informazioni personali che raccogliamo ci consentono di tenere aggiornato l’utente sulle ultime novità dei prodotti BeLight Software, sugli aggiornamenti software e sugli eventi in programma. Qualora l’utente non voglia essere incluso nella nostra mailing list, può annullarne l’iscrizione in qualsiasi momento scrivendo all’indirizzo:
news@belightsoft.com
Utilizziamo inoltre le informazioni personali per poter creare, sviluppare, far funzionare, offrire e migliorare i nostri prodotti, servizi, contenuti e materiali pubblicitari, nonché per prevenire perdite.
Potremmo inoltre utilizzare le informazioni personali dell’utente per verificare l’identità, agevolare l’identificazione degli utenti e per stabilire quali siano i servizi più appropriati.
Occasionalmente potremmo utilizzare le informazioni personali per inviare avvisi importanti, come le comunicazioni sugli acquisti e sulle modifiche ai nostri termini, condizioni e norme. Poiché tali informazioni sono importanti per l’interazione dell’utente con BeLight Software, non è possibile scegliere di non ricevere queste comunicazioni.
Potremmo inoltre utilizzare le informazioni personali per scopi quali verifica, analisi dei dati e ricerca al fine di migliorare i prodotti, i servizi e le comunicazioni con i clienti di BeLight Software.
Se l’utente partecipa a una lotteria, un concorso o un simile programma promozionale, potremmo utilizzare le informazioni che ci fornisce per gestire tali programmi.
Raccolta e uso delle informazioni non personali
Potremmo raccogliamo anche dati in una forma tale che non permette l’associazione diretta a un individuo specifico. Potremmo raccogliere, utilizzare, trasferire e divulgare le informazioni non personali per scopi di qualsiasi genere. Quelli che seguono sono alcuni esempi di informazioni non personali che raccogliamo e dei modi in cui le utilizziamo:
Potremmo raccogliere informazioni quali occupazione, lingua, CAP, prefisso internazionale, identificatore univoco del dispositivo, URL del referrer, posizione e fuso orario in cui viene utilizzato un prodotto BeLight Software per comprendere meglio il comportamento degli utenti e migliorare i nostri prodotti, servizi e materiali pubblicitari.
Potremmo raccogliere informazioni riguardanti le attività dei clienti sui nostri siti web e dagli altri prodotti e servizi di nostra proprietà. Queste informazioni vengono aggregate e utilizzate per fornire ai nostri clienti informazioni più utili con lo scopo di comprendere quali parti del nostro sito web e dei nostri prodotti e servizi sono considerati più interessanti. Per gli scopi della presente Informativa sulla privacy, i dati aggregati sono ritenuti informazioni non personali.
Con l’autorizzazione dell’utente, potremmo raccogliere informazioni e dati statistici sull’utilizzo del software e sul comportamento dell’utente durante l’utilizzo del software. Utilizzeremo questi dati internamente per comprendere come migliorare il software e l’esperienza dell’utente. L’utente può, in qualsiasi momento, revocare l’autorizzazione alla raccolta dei dati statistici sull’utilizzo del software attraverso le impostazioni dell’app su iOS/iPadOS e le preferenze dell’app su macOS. (Non vengono raccolti dati statistici relativi all'utilizzo del software su Windows e Android.)
Qualora combiniamo le informazioni non personali con quelle personali, tali informazioni combinate vengono trattate come informazioni personali per tutto il tempo in cui restano combinate.
Cookie e altre tecnologie
I siti web, i servizi online, le applicazioni interattive, i messaggi e-mail e i materiali pubblicitari di BeLight Software possono fare uso dei "cookie" e di altre tecnologie quali tag di pixel e web beacon. Queste tecnologie ci consentono di comprendere meglio il comportamento degli utenti e quali parti dei nostri siti web vengono visitate, nonché di agevolare e misurare l’efficacia degli annunci pubblicitari e delle ricerche sul Web. Trattiamo le informazioni raccolte dai cookie e dalle altre tecnologie come informazioni non personali. Nel caso in cui, tuttavia, gli indirizzi IP o identificatori simili siano considerati informazioni personali dalle leggi locali, trattiamo anche questi identificatori come informazioni personali. Analogamente, nel caso in cui le informazioni non personali vengano combinate con quelle personali, trattiamo le informazioni combinate come informazioni personali per gli scopi delineati nella presente Informativa sulla privacy.
Se l’utente decide di disattivare i cookie e utilizza il browser Safari, può andare alle preferenze del browser, quindi al riquadro della privacy per gestire le proprie preferenze. Per gli altri browser è consigliabile consultare il proprio fornitore del servizio da cui ottenere le informazioni sulla disattivazione dei cookie. Si tenga presente che, una volta disattivati i cookie, determinate funzionalità del sito web di BeLight Software non saranno più disponibili.
Come nel caso della maggior parte dei servizi Internet, raccogliamo automaticamente alcune informazioni e le archiviamo nei file di registro. Tra queste informazioni sono inclusi gli indirizzi IP, il tipo e la lingua del browser, il provider dei servizi Internet (ISP), i siti web e le applicazioni di provenienza e uscita, il sistema operativo, la data e l’ora e i dati di clickstream.
Utilizziamo queste informazioni per comprendere e analizzare le tendenze, per gestire il sito, per informazioni sul comportamento dell’utente sul sito, per migliorare i nostri prodotti e servizi e per raccogliere informazioni demografiche riguardanti la nostra base di utenti nel suo insieme. BeLight Software potrebbe utilizzare queste informazioni nei propri servizi di marketing e pubblicitari.
In alcuni dei nostri messaggi e-mail, utilizziamo un “URL di click-through” collegato ai contenuti del sito web di BeLight Software. Quando i clienti fanno clic su uno di questi URL, passano attraverso un web server separato prima di arrivare alla pagina di destinazione sul nostro sito. Teniamo traccia di questi dati di click-through per poter capire se c’è interesse in particolari argomenti e per misurare l’efficacia delle nostre comunicazioni con i clienti. Se l’utente preferisce che questa sua attività non venga tracciata, non deve fare clic sui link testuali o grafici presenti nei messaggi e-mail. I tag di pixel ci consentono di inviare messaggi e-mail in un formato leggibile da parte degli utenti e ci permettono di sapere se tali messaggi vengono aperti. Potremmo utilizzare queste informazioni per ridurre o eliminare i messaggi inviati ai clienti.
Divulgazione a terzi
Talvolta BeLight Software potrebbe rendere disponibili determinate informazioni a partner strategici che collaborano con BeLight Software per fornire prodotti e servizi o che supportano BeLight Software nella commercializzazione. Le informazioni personali verranno condivise da BeLight Software unicamente per fornire o migliorare i propri prodotti, servizi e materiali pubblicitari; non verranno condivisi con terzi per gli scopi di marketing di tali terze parti.
Fornitori di servizi
BeLight Software condivide le informazioni personali con aziende che forniscono servizi quali elaborazione delle informazioni, elaborazione degli ordini dei clienti, consegna dei prodotti, gestione e perfezionamento dei dati dei clienti, assistenza ai clienti, valutazione dell’interesse degli utenti rispetto ai prodotti e servizi e svolgimento di ricerche o sondaggi sulla soddisfazione dei clienti. Queste aziende sono tenute a proteggere le informazioni dell’utente.
Servizi che utilizziamo e rispettive informative sulla privacy:
Utilizziamo Google Analytics per analizzare il comportamento e l’attività dei visitatori del nostro sito Web:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Utilizziamo YouTube per la riproduzione dei contenuti video:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Utilizziamo Vimeo per la riproduzione dei contenuti video:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
Utilizziamo FastSpring per l’elaborazione degli ordini online:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Utilizziamo Paddle per l’elaborazione degli ordini online:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
Utilizziamo ImpactRadius per monitorare le vendite generate dai siti web che inviano traffico di affiliazione ai nostri prodotti:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Utilizziamo il servizio Trimble 3D Warehouse per permettere agli utenti di accedere all’archiviazione online dei modelli 3D:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
Utilizziamo i servizi API di YouTube per caricare video tour su YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Utilizziamo Devtodev come soluzione per la raccolta e l’analisi del comportamento dell’utente all’interno del software:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Altro
Potrebbe essere necessario per BeLight Software (perché previsto dalla legge, da procedure legali, da controversie e/o perché richiesto dalle autorità pubbliche e governative all’interno o all’esterno del paese di residenza dell’utente) divulgare le informazioni personali dell’utente. Potremmo inoltre divulgare informazioni sull’utente se stabiliamo che tale divulgazione è necessaria per l’applicazione dei nostri termini e condizioni o per proteggere le nostre operazioni o i nostri utenti. In aggiunta, in caso di una riorganizzazione, fusione o vendita, potremmo trasferire tutte le informazioni personali che raccogliamo alla terza parte pertinente.
Protezione delle informazioni personali
BeLight Software tratta con la massima serietà la sicurezza delle informazioni personali dell’utente. Le informazioni personali dell’utente in transito sui servizi online di BeLight Software, come il web store di BeLight Software e lo store incorporato nel software, sono protette mediante protocolli di crittografia come TLS (Transport Layer Security). Quando BeLight Software archivia dati personali, utilizza sistemi con accesso limitato e archiviazione crittografata.
Quando l’utente utilizza alcuni dei prodotti, dei servizi o delle applicazioni di BeLight Software o pubblica un messaggio sul forum, sulla stanza di chat o sul servizio di social networking di BeLight Software, le informazioni e i contenuti personali che condivide sono visibili agli altri utenti e possono essere letti, raccolti o utilizzati da tali persone. In tali circostanze, l’utente è responsabile delle informazioni personali che sceglie di condividere o inviare.
Integrità e conservazione delle informazioni personali
BeLight Software conserva le informazioni personali dell’utente per il periodo necessario a soddisfare gli scopi delineati nella presente Informativa sulla privacy, a meno che la legge non preveda o permetta un periodo di conservazione più lungo.
Accesso alle informazioni personali
Le richieste di accesso, correzione o eliminazione possono essere presentate via e-mail all’indirizzo
info@belightsoft.com
Minori
Se veniamo a conoscenza di aver raccolto le informazioni personali di un minore di 13 anni o di un’età minima equivalente a seconda della giurisdizione, intraprenderemo le azioni necessarie per eliminare al più presto tali informazioni.
I genitori possono contattarci via e-mail all’indirizzo:
info@belightsoft.com
Siti e servizi di terze parti
I siti web, i prodotti, le applicazioni e i servizi di BeLight Software possono contenere collegamenti a siti web, prodotti e servizi di terze parti. I nostri prodotti e servizi possono inoltre utilizzare o offrire prodotti o servizi di terzi. Le informazioni raccolte da tali terze parti, tra cui, ad esempio, i dati sulla posizione o i dettagli di contatto, sono governate dalle rispettive norme sulla privacy. Incoraggiamo l’utente a informarsi delle norme sulla privacy di tali terze parti.
Impegno nei confronti della privacy dell’utente
Per avere la certezza che le informazioni personali degli utenti siano protette, comunichiamo le nostre linee guida in materia di privacy e sicurezza ai dipendenti di BeLight Software e applichiamo rigide misure di sicurezza per la privacy.
Domande
In caso di dubbi o domande riguardo all’Informativa sulla privacy o all’elaborazione dei dati di BeLight Software, o se si desidera presentare un reclamo per una possibile violazione delle leggi sulla privacy locali, l’utente è invitato a contattarci all’indirizzo:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software potrebbe aggiornare occasionalmente l’Informativa sulla privacy. Qualora venga apportata una modifica sostanziale, verrà pubblicato un avviso sul nostro sito web insieme alla versione aggiornata dell’Informativa.
Declaración de privacidad de BeLight Software
Su privacidad es importante para nosotros. En esta Declaración de privacidad se describe cómo recopilamos, usamos, revelamos, transferimos y almacenamos su información.
Recopilación y uso de información personal
Se consideran información personal los datos que puedan utilizarse para identificar a una persona o contactar con ella.
Es posible que se le solicite información personal cuando esté en contacto con BeLight Software. Podemos compartir y usar esta información de conformidad con esta Declaración de privacidad. También podemos combinarla con otra información para proporcionar y mejorar nuestros productos, servicios, contenidos y publicidad. No está obligado a proporcionar la información personal que hemos solicitado, pero, si opta por no hacerlo, en muchos casos no podremos proporcionarle nuestros productos o servicios o responder a las consultas que pudiera tener.
Qué información personal recopilamos:
Cuando compra un producto, descarga un software o una actualización, se suscribe a boletines de noticias de la empresa o de un producto concreto, se comunica con nosotros o participa en una encuesta en línea, podemos recopilar diversa información, incluyendo su nombre, dirección postal, número de teléfono y dirección de correo electrónico.
Cómo utilizamos su información personal:
La información personal que recopilamos nos permite tenerle al corriente de los últimos anuncios de productos de BeLight Software, actualizaciones de software y acontecimientos futuros. Si no desea estar en nuestra lista de correo, puede optar por abandonarla en cualquier momento enviándonos un correo electrónico a:
news@belightsoft.com
También utilizamos información personal para ayudarnos a crear, desarrollar, operar, entregar y mejorar nuestros productos, servicios, contenidos y publicidad, así como para la prevención de pérdidas.
Podemos usar su información personal para verificar la identidad, ayudar en la identificación de los usuarios y determinar los servicios adecuados.
De vez en cuando, podemos utilizar su información personal para enviar avisos importantes, como comunicaciones sobre compras y cambios en nuestros términos, condiciones y políticas. Debido a que esta información es importante para su interacción con BeLight Software, no puede optar por no recibir estas comunicaciones.
También podemos usar información personal para fines internos, como los de auditoría, análisis de datos e investigación para mejorar los productos, servicios y comunicaciones con los clientes de BeLight Software.
Si participa en un sorteo, concurso o promoción similar, podemos usar la información que nos facilite para administrar esos programas.
Recopilación y uso de información no personal
También podemos recopilamos datos de una forma que, por sí sola, no permite la asociación directa con ningún individuo en concreto. Podemos recopilar, usar, transferir y revelar información no personal para cualquier propósito. Estos son algunos ejemplos de información no personal que recopilamos y cómo podemos utilizarla:
Podemos recopilar información como la profesión, el idioma, código postal, código de área, identificador único de dispositivo, URL de referencia, ubicación y zona horaria donde se utiliza un producto de BeLight Software con el fin de comprender mejor el comportamiento de los clientes y mejorar nuestros productos, servicios y publicidad.
Podemos recopilar información sobre las actividades de los clientes en nuestros sitios web y desde nuestros otros productos y servicios. Esta información se agrupa y se utiliza para ayudarnos a proporcionar información más útil a nuestros clientes y para comprender qué partes de nuestros sitios web, productos y servicios son de mayor interés. Los datos agrupados se consideran información no personal a los efectos de esta Declaración de privacidad.
Con su permiso, podemos recopilar información y estadísticas sobre el uso del software y el comportamiento del usuario mientras utiliza el software. Usaremos estos datos internamente para comprender cómo mejorar nuestro software y la experiencia de los usuarios. En cualquier momento, puede retirar el permiso para recopilar estadísticas del uso del software en los ajustes de configuración de la aplicación en iOS/iPadOS, o en las preferencias de la aplicación en macOS. (No se recopilan estadísticas de uso de programas en Windows y Android.)
Si combinamos información no personal con información personal, la información combinada se tratará como información personal mientras permanezca combinada.
Cookies y otras tecnologías
Los sitios web, servicios en línea, aplicaciones interactivas, mensajes de correo electrónico y anuncios de BeLight Software pueden utilizar "cookies" y otras tecnologías como etiquetas de píxeles y balizas web. Estas tecnologías nos ayudan a comprender mejor el comportamiento de los usuarios, nos indican qué partes de nuestros sitios web se han visitado y facilitan y miden la efectividad de los anuncios y de las búsquedas en la web. Tratamos la información recopilada por las cookies y otras tecnologías como información no personal. No obstante, en la medida en que las direcciones IP (Protocolo de Internet) u otros identificadores similares se consideren información personal según la legislación local, también tratamos estos identificadores como información personal. Asimismo, en la medida en que la información no personal se combina con información personal, tratamos la información combinada como información personal a los efectos de esta Declaración de privacidad.
Si desea desactivar las cookies y utiliza el navegador web Safari, vaya a las preferencias de Safari y, a continuación, al panel de privacidad para administrar sus preferencias. Para otros navegadores, consulte con su proveedor para saber cómo desactivar las cookies. Tenga en cuenta que ciertas características del sitio web de BeLight Software no estarán disponibles una vez desactivadas las cookies.
Como es el caso con la mayoría de los servicios de internet, recopilamos cierta información automáticamente y la almacenamos en archivos de registro. Esta información incluye direcciones IP (Protocolo de Internet), tipo de navegador e idioma, proveedor de internet (ISP), sitios web y aplicaciones de referencia y de salida, sistema operativo, sello de fecha/hora y datos de la secuencia de clics.
Utilizamos esta información para comprender y analizar tendencias, administrar el sitio, conocer mejor el comportamiento de los usuarios en el sitio, mejorar nuestros productos y servicios y recopilar información demográfica sobre nuestra base de usuarios en general. Podemos utilizar esta información en nuestros servicios de marketing y publicidad de BeLight Software.
En algunos de nuestros mensajes de correo electrónico, utilizamos una "URL de click-through" vinculada al contenido del sitio web de BeLight Software. Cuando los clientes hacen clic en una de estas URL, pasan por un servidor web separado antes de llegar a la página de destino en nuestro sitio web. Rastreamos estos datos de "click-through" para ayudarnos a determinar el interés por temas concretos y medir la efectividad de nuestras comunicaciones con los clientes. Si prefiere no ser rastreado de esta forma, no debería hacer clic en los enlaces de texto o gráficos de los mensajes de correo electrónico. Las etiquetas de píxeles nos permiten enviar mensajes de correo electrónico en un formato que los clientes puedan leer, y nos indican si el correo se ha abierto. Podemos usar esta información para reducir o eliminar los mensajes enviados a los clientes.
Revelación a terceros
En ocasiones, BeLight Software puede poner cierta información personal a disposición de socios estratégicos que trabajan con BeLight Software para proporcionar productos y servicios, o que ayudan a BeLight Software en cuestiones de marketing. La información personal solo será compartida por BeLight Software para proporcionar o mejorar nuestros productos, servicios y publicidad; no se compartirá con terceros para finalidades de marketing de dichos terceros.
Proveedores de servicios
BeLight Software comparte información personal con empresas que ofrecen servicios tales como el procesamiento de información, el cumplimiento de los pedidos de los clientes, la entrega a usted de productos, la administración y mejora de datos de los clientes, la prestación de servicios al cliente, la evaluación del interés de usted en nuestros productos y servicios y la realización de estudios de clientes o encuestas de satisfacción. Estas empresas están obligadas a proteger su información.
Servicios que utilizamos y sus respectivas políticas de privacidad:
Google Analytics se utiliza para analizar el comportamiento y la actividad de los visitantes de un sitio web:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube se utiliza para la reproducción de contenidos de vídeo:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo se utiliza para la reproducción de contenidos de vídeo:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring se utiliza para el procesamiento de pedidos en línea:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle se utiliza para el procesamiento de pedidos en línea:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius se utiliza para rastrear las ventas generadas por los sitios web que envían tráfico de afiliados a nuestros productos:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
El servicio 3D Warehouse de Trimble se utiliza para proporcionar acceso a los usuarios al almacenamiento en línea de modelos 3D:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
Los servicios de la API de YouTube se utilizan para subir recorridos en vídeo a YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev se utiliza como solución para recopilar y analizar el comportamiento del usuario dentro del software:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Otros
Puede ser necesario (por ley, proceso legal, litigio y/o a petición de autoridades públicas y gubernamentales, dentro o fuera de su país de residencia) que BeLight Software deba revelar su información personal. También podemos revelar información sobre usted si determinamos que esto es razonablemente necesario para hacer cumplir nuestros términos y condiciones o para proteger nuestras operaciones o a nuestros usuarios. Además, en caso de reorganización, fusión o venta, podemos transferir toda la información personal que recopilemos al tercero implicado.
Protección de información personal
BeLight Software se toma muy en serio la seguridad de su información personal. Los servicios en línea de BeLight Software, como la tienda web de BeLight Software y la tienda integrada en el software, protegen su información personal durante el tránsito mediante protocolos de cifrado como el TLS (seguridad de la capa de transporte). Cuando en BeLight Software guardamos sus datos personales, utilizamos sistemas informáticos con acceso limitado y almacenamiento cifrado.
Cuando usted utiliza algunos productos, servicios o aplicaciones de BeLight Software o publica en un foro, chat o servicio de redes sociales de BeLight Software, la información personal y el contenido que comparte son visibles para otros usuarios y pueden ser leídos, recopilados o utilizados por ellos. En esos casos, es usted responsable de la información personal que elija compartir o enviar.
Integridad y retención de información personal
BeLight Software retendrá su información personal durante el tiempo necesario para cumplir con los fines descritos en esta Declaración de privacidad, a menos que la ley exija o permita un tiempo de retención más largo.
Acceso a la información personal
Las solicitudes de acceso, corrección o eliminación pueden enviarse por correo electrónico a:
info@belightsoft.com
Niños
Si descubrimos que hemos recopilado información personal de un niño menor de 13 años, o la edad mínima equivalente según la jurisdicción, tomaremos medidas para eliminar la información lo antes posible.
Los padres pueden contactar con nosotros por correo electrónico escribiendo a:
info@belightsoft.com
Sitios y servicios de terceros
Los sitios web, productos, aplicaciones y servicios de BeLight Software pueden contener enlaces a sitios web, productos y servicios de terceros. Nuestros productos y servicios también pueden usar u ofrecer productos o servicios de terceros. La información recopilada por terceros, que puede incluir aspectos como datos de ubicación o de contacto, se rige por las prácticas de privacidad de dichos terceros. Le animamos a que se informe acerca de las prácticas de privacidad de esos terceros.
Compromiso con su privacidad
Para garantizar que su información personal esté protegida, comunicamos nuestras pautas de privacidad y seguridad a los empleados de BeLight Software y hacemos cumplir estrictamente las garantías de privacidad dentro de la empresa.
Preguntas
Si tiene alguna pregunta o inquietud sobre la Declaración de privacidad de BeLight Software o sobre el procesamiento de los datos, o si desea presentar una queja por una posible vulneración de las leyes de privacidad locales, por favor póngase en contacto con nosotros escribiendo a:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software puede actualizar su Declaración de privacidad de vez en cuando. Cuando realicemos modificaciones significativas en la política, se publicará un aviso en nuestro sitio web junto con la Declaración de privacidad actualizada.
Declaração de Privacidade da BeLight Software
Sua privacidade é importante para nós. Esta Declaração de Privacidade abrange o modo como coletamos, usamos, divulgamos, transferimos e armazenamos suas informações.
Coleta e Uso de Informações Pessoais
Informações pessoais são dados que podem ser usados para identificar ou contatar uma única pessoa.
Você pode ser solicitado a fornecer suas informações pessoais sempre que estiver em contato com a BeLight Software. Podemos compartilhar e usar essas informações de acordo com esta Declaração de Privacidade. Também podemos combiná-lo com outras informações para fornecer e melhorar nossos produtos, serviços, conteúdo e publicidade. Você não é obrigado a fornecer as informações pessoais que solicitamos, mas, se optar por não fazê-lo, em muitos casos, não poderemos fornecer nossos produtos ou serviços ou responder a dúvidas que você possa ter.
Quais informações pessoais coletamos:
Quando você compra um produto, baixa um software ou uma atualização, se inscreve para receber boletins informativos da empresa ou de produtos, entra em contato conosco ou participa de uma pesquisa on-line, podemos coletar uma variedade de informações, incluindo seu nome, endereço de correspondência, número de telefone e endereço de e-mail.
Como usamos suas informações pessoais:
As informações pessoais que coletamos nos permitem mantê-lo informado sobre os últimos anúncios de produtos, atualizações de software e eventos futuros da BeLight Software. Se você não quiser estar em nossa lista de e-mails, você pode cancelar sua inscrição a qualquer momento enviando um e-mail para:
news@belightsoft.com
Também usamos informações pessoais para nos ajudar a criar, desenvolver, operar, entregar e melhorar nossos produtos, serviços, conteúdo e publicidade, bem como para fins de prevenção contra perdas.
Podemos usar suas informações pessoais para verificar a identidade, ajudar na identificação de usuários e determinar os serviços apropriados.
Periodicamente, podemos usar suas informações pessoais para enviar avisos importantes, como comunicações sobre compras e alterações em nossos termos, condições e políticas. Como essas informações são importantes para sua interação com a BeLight Software, você não pode optar por não receber essas comunicações.
Também podemos usar as informações pessoais para fins internos, como auditoria, análise de dados e pesquisa para melhorar os produtos, serviços e comunicações ao cliente da BeLight Software.
Se você participar de um sorteio, concurso ou promoção semelhante, poderemos usar as informações fornecidas para administrar esses programas.
Coleta e Uso de Informações Não Pessoais
Também podemos coletamos dados de uma forma que, por si só, não permite associação direta com qualquer indivíduo específico. Podemos coletar, usar, transferir e divulgar informações não pessoais para qualquer finalidade. A seguir estão alguns exemplos de informações não pessoais que coletamos e como podemos usá-las:
Podemos coletar informações como profissão, idioma, código postal, código de área, identificador exclusivo de dispositivo, URL de referência, localização e fuso horário onde um produto da BeLight Software é usado para que possamos entender melhor o comportamento do cliente e melhorar nossos produtos, serviços e publicidade.
Podemos coletar informações sobre as atividades do cliente em nossos sites e de nossos outros produtos e serviços. Essas informações são agregadas e usadas para nos ajudar a fornecer informações mais úteis aos nossos clientes e para entender quais partes do nosso site, produtos e serviços são de maior interesse. Os dados agregados são considerados informações não pessoais para os fins desta Declaração de Privacidade.
Somente com a sua permissão, podemos coletar informações e estatísticas sobre o uso do software e o comportamento do usuário durante o uso do software. Usaremos esses dados internamente para entender como melhorar nosso software e a experiência do usuário. A qualquer momento, você pode recuperar a permissão para coletar estatísticas de uso do software por meio das configurações do aplicativo no iOS/iPadOS e nas preferências do aplicativo no macOS. (As estatísticas de uso do programa Windows e Android não são coletadas.)
Se combinarmos informações não pessoais com informações pessoais, as informações combinadas serão tratadas como informações pessoais enquanto permanecerem combinadas.
Cookies e Outras Tecnologias
Os sites, serviços on-line, aplicativos interativos, mensagens de e-mail e anúncios da BeLight Software podem usar "cookies" e outras tecnologias, como pixel tags e web beacons. Essas tecnologias nos ajudam a entender melhor o comportamento do usuário, nos informam quais partes de nossos sites as pessoas visitaram e facilitam e avaliam a eficácia de anúncios e pesquisas na web. Tratamos as informações coletadas por cookies e outras tecnologias como informações não pessoais. No entanto, até a medida em que endereços IP (Protocolo de Internet) ou identificadores semelhantes são considerados informações pessoais pela lei local, também tratamos esses identificadores como informações pessoais. Da mesma forma, até a medida em que informações não pessoais são combinadas com informações pessoais, tratamos as informações combinadas como informações pessoais para os fins desta Declaração de Privacidade.
Se você deseja desativar os cookies e está usando o navegador Safari, vá para as Preferências do Safari e depois para o painel Privacidade para gerenciar suas preferências. Para outros navegadores, consulte seu provedor para saber como desativar os cookies. Observe que determinados recursos do site da BeLight Software não estarão disponíveis quando os cookies forem desativados.
Como acontece com a maioria dos serviços de internet, coletamos algumas informações automaticamente e as armazenamos em arquivos de log. Essas informações incluem endereços IP, tipo e idioma do navegador, provedor de serviços de Internet, sites e aplicativos de referência e saída, sistema operacional, carimbo de data/hora e dados de sequência de cliques.
Usamos essas informações para entender e analisar tendências, administrar o site, aprender sobre o comportamento do usuário no site, melhorar nossos produtos e serviços e coletar informações demográficas sobre nossa base de usuários como um todo. A BeLight Software pode usar essas informações em nossos serviços de marketing e publicidade.
Em algumas de nossas mensagens de e-mail, usamos um "URL de clique" vinculado ao conteúdo do site da BeLight Software. Quando os clientes clicam em um desses URLs, eles passam por um servidor da web separado antes de chegar à página de destino em nosso site. Rastreamos esses dados de cliques para nos ajudar a determinar o interesse em tópicos específicos e medir a eficácia de nossas comunicações com o cliente. Se preferir não ser rastreado dessa maneira, não clique em links de texto ou imagens nas mensagens de e-mail. Os pixel tags nos permitem enviar mensagens de e-mail em um formato que os clientes podem ler e também nos informam se o e-mail foi aberto. Podemos usar essas informações para reduzir ou eliminar mensagens enviadas aos clientes.
Divulgação a Terceiros
Às vezes, a BeLight Software pode disponibilizar determinadas informações pessoais a parceiros estratégicos que trabalham com a BeLight Software para fornecer produtos e serviços ou que ajudam a BeLight Software a comercializar para os clientes. As informações pessoais só serão compartilhadas pela BeLight Software para fornecer ou melhorar nossos produtos, serviços e publicidade; elas não serão compartilhadas com terceiros para seus fins de marketing.
Provedores de Serviços
A BeLight Software compartilha informações pessoais com empresas que fornecem serviços como processamento de informações, atendimento de pedidos de clientes, entrega de produtos a você, gerenciamento e aprimoramento de dados de clientes, atendimento ao cliente, avaliação de seu interesse em nossos produtos e serviços e realização de pesquisas de clientes ou pesquisas de satisfação. Essas empresas são obrigadas a proteger suas informações.
Serviços que usamos e suas respectivas políticas de privacidade:
O Google Analytics é usado para analisar o comportamento e a atividade dos visitantes do site:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
O YouTube é usado para reprodução de conteúdo de vídeo:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
O Vimeo é usado para reprodução de conteúdo de vídeo:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
O FastSpring é usado para processamento de pedidos on-line:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
O Paddle é usado para processamento de pedidos on-line:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
O ImpactRadius é usado para rastrear vendas geradas por sites que enviam tráfego de afiliados para nossos produtos:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
O serviço Trimble 3D Warehouse é usado para fornecer aos usuários acesso ao armazenamento on-line de modelos 3D:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
Os serviços de API do YouTube são usados para enviar vídeos passo a passo para o YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
O Devtodev é usado como uma solução para coletar e analisar o comportamento do usuário dentro do software:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Outros
Pode ser necessário – por lei, processo legal, litígio e/ou solicitações de autoridades públicas e governamentais dentro ou fora do seu país de residência – que a BeLight Software divulgue suas informações pessoais. Também podemos divulgar informações sobre você se determinarmos que a divulgação é razoavelmente necessária para fazer cumprir nossos termos e condições ou proteger nossas operações ou usuários. Além disso, no caso de uma reorganização, fusão ou venda, podemos transferir toda e qualquer informação pessoal que coletamos para o terceiro relevante.
Proteção de Informações Pessoais
A BeLight Software leva muito a sério a segurança de suas informações pessoais. Os serviços on-line da BeLight Software, como a loja do site da BeLight Software e serviços incorporados na loja do software, protegem suas informações pessoais durante o trânsito usando criptografia como TLS (Segurança de Camada de Transporte). Quando seus dados pessoais são armazenados pela BeLight Software, usamos sistemas de computador com acesso limitado e armazenamento criptografado.
Quando você usa alguns produtos, serviços ou aplicativos da BeLight Software, ou publica em um fórum, sala de bate-papo ou serviço de rede social da BeLight Software, as informações pessoais e o conteúdo que você compartilha ficam visíveis para outros usuários e podem ser lidos, coletados ou usados por eles. Nesses casos, você é responsável pelas informações pessoais que optar por compartilhar ou enviar.
Integridade e Retenção de Informações Pessoais
A BeLight Software reterá suas informações pessoais pelo período necessário para cumprir os propósitos descritos nesta Declaração de Privacidade, a menos que um período de retenção mais longo seja exigido ou permitido por lei.
Acesso a Informações Pessoais
As solicitações de acesso, correção ou exclusão podem ser feitas através do e-mail:
info@belightsoft.com
Crianças
Se soubermos que coletamos as informações pessoais de uma criança menor de 13 anos, ou idade mínima equivalente, dependendo da jurisdição, tomaremos medidas para excluir as informações o mais rápido possível.
Os pais podem entrar em contato conosco pelo e-mail:
info@belightsoft.com
Sites e Serviços de Terceiros
Os sites, produtos, aplicativos e serviços da BeLight Software podem conter links para sites, produtos e serviços de terceiros. Nossos produtos e serviços também podem usar ou oferecer produtos ou serviços de terceiros. As informações coletadas por terceiros, que podem incluir dados de localização ou detalhes de contato, são regidas por suas práticas de privacidade. Incentivamos você a conhecer as práticas de privacidade desses terceiros.
Compromisso com a sua Privacidade
Para garantir que suas informações pessoais estejam seguras, comunicamos nossas diretrizes de privacidade e segurança aos funcionários da BeLight Software e aplicamos rigorosamente as proteções de privacidade dentro da empresa.
Perguntas
Se você tiver alguma dúvida ou preocupação sobre a Declaração de Privacidade da BeLight Software ou o processamento de dados, ou se quiser fazer uma reclamação sobre uma possível violação das leis de privacidade locais, entre em contato conosco pelo e-mail:
info@belightsoft.com
A BeLight Software pode atualizar sua Declaração de Privacidade periodicamente. Quando alterarmos a política de forma material, um aviso será publicado em nosso site juntamente com a Declaração de Privacidade atualizada.
BeLight Software のプライバシーに関する声明
当社にとって、お客様のプライバシーは重要です。本プライバシーに関する声明では、当社がお客様の情報をどのように収集、利用、開示、移転および保存するのかについて規定しています。
個人情報の収集および利用について
個人情報とは、特定の個人を特定したり、または特定の個人に連絡するために利用できるデータのことです。
お客様は、BeLight Software と連絡を取った際にいつでも、お客様の個人情報の提供を求められる場合があります。当社は、本プライバシーに関する声明に従って、当該個人情報を共有したり、利用する場合があります。また、当社は、当社の製品、サービス、コンテンツおよび広告を提供および向上するためにも、当該情報を他の情報と統合することがあります。お客様は、当社が要求した個人情報を提供する義務はありませんが、個人情報を提供しないことを選択した場合、当社からお客様に対して製品またはサービスを提供できなかったり、お客様からのお問い合わせに回答できないことが多々あります。
当社が収集する個人情報とは
お客様が製品の購入、ソフトウェアまたはアップデートのダウンロード、当社または製品のニュースレターへの登録、当社へのお問い合わせ、またはオンラインアンケートへの回答を行う際、当社は、お客様の氏名、住所、電話番号、電子メールアドレスなど、さまざまな情報を収集することがあります。
個人情報の利用方法
個人情報を収集することで、当社は、BeLight Software 製品の最新情報、ソフトウェアのアップデート、およびイベントの予告を継続的に行うことができます。当社メーリングリストへの登録を希望されない場合は、次の宛先にメールでご連絡いただくことで、いつでも登録を解除できます。
news@belightsoft.com
また、当社は、当社の製品、サービス、コンテンツおよび広告の作成、開発、運用、提供および向上に役立てたり、損失を防止するためにも、個人情報を利用します。
当社は、お客様の個人情報を、本人確認、ユーザの識別の補助、および適切なサービスの判断のために利用することがあります。
当社は、購入に関する連絡や、当社の規約、条件およびポリシーの変更などの重要な通知をお送りするために、お客様の個人情報を利用することがあります。この情報は、BeLight Software とお客様のやり取りにとって重要なため、お客様は、このような連絡を受信しないという選択はできません。
また、当社は、BeLight Software 製品、サービスおよびカスタマーコミュニケーションの向上のための監査、データ分析および調査などの社内利用の目的で、個人情報を利用することもあります。
お客様が懸賞、コンテスト、その他の類似のプロモーションに参加する場合、当社は、これらのプログラムを管理するために、お客様が提供した情報を利用することがあります。
非個人情報の収集および利用について
また、それ自体では特定の個人と直接関連付けることができない形式でデータを収集します。 当社は、さまざまな目的で非個人情報を収集、利用、移転および開示することがあります。以下は、当社が収集する非個人情報の種類およびその利用方法の例です。
当社は、お客様の動向をよりよく理解して、当社の製品、サービスおよび広告を向上させるために、職業、言語、郵便番号、市外局番・エリアコード、固有のデバイス識別子、リファラー URL、所在地、BeLight Software 製品が使用されているタイムゾーンなどの情報を収集することがあります。
当社は、当社のウェブサイトにおいて、および当社のその他の製品やサービスから、お客様の活動に関する情報を収集することがあります。その情報を集計して、お客様により有益な情報を提供したり、当社のウェブサイト、製品およびサービスのどの部分にお客様がもっとも関心を持っているかを把握したりするために役立てています。統計データは、本プライバシーに関する声明において、非個人情報とみなされます。
当社は、お客様の許可の下に、ソフトウェアの利用状況やソフトウェアを使用しているときのユーザの動向に関する情報および統計を収集することがあります。当社はこの情報を、当社ソフトウェアやユーザエクスペリエンスをいかに改善できるかを理解するために、社内で使用いたします。お客様は、iOS／iPadOS のアプリ設定、および macOS のアプリ環境設定を通じて、いつでもソフトウェアの利用に関する統計情報の収集許可を取り消すことができます。 (WindowsとAndroidでは、ソフトウェアの使用統計は収集されません。)
非個人情報を個人情報と統合する場合、その統合された情報は、統合されている限り、個人情報として扱われます。
Cookie およびその他の技術について
BeLight Software のウェブサイト、オンラインサービス、対話型アプリケーション、電子メールメッセージおよび広告では、「Cookie」およびピクセルタグやウェブビーコンなどのその他の技術を利用することがあります。これらの技術は、当社がユーザの行動をよりよく理解するのに役立ち、当社のウェブサイトのどの部分に訪問したのかを示し、広告やウェブ検索の効果を促進し、評価します。当社は、Cookie およびその他の技術で収集した情報を非個人情報として取り扱います。ただし、インターネットプロトコル（IP）アドレスまたは類似の識別子が管轄法により個人情報とみなされる場合には、当社は、これらの識別子も個人情報として取り扱います。同様に、非個人情報が個人情報と統合される場合、当社は、本プライバシーに関する声明の下、その統合された情報を個人情報として取り扱います。
Safari ウェブブラウザを使用しており、Cookie を無効にしたい場合は、Safari 環境設定の「プライバシー」ペインで必要な設定を行います。その他のブラウザについては、お客様のプロバイダに連絡し、Cookie を無効にする方法を確認してください。Cookie を無効にすると、BeLight Software ウェブサイトの一部の機能がご利用いただけなくなります。
ほとんどのインターネットサービスと同様に、当社は、一部の情報を自動的に収集してログファイルに保存しています。この情報には、インターネットプロトコル（IP）アドレス、ブラウザの種類と言語、インターネットサービスプロバイダ（ISP）、参照元／離脱ウェブサイトとアプリケーション、オペレーティングシステム、日付／時刻スタンプ、クリックストリームデータが含まれます。
当社は、これらの情報を利用して、トレンドの把握と分析、サイトの管理、ユーザの行動の把握、当社の製品とサービスの向上、および当社のユーザベース全体の人口統計情報の収集を行っています。BeLight Software は、これらの情報をマーケティングや広告サービスに利用することがあります。
当社の一部のメールメッセージでは、BeLight Software ウェブサイトの内容にリンクした「クリックスルー URL」を使用しています。お客様がこの URL のいずれかをクリックすると、別のウェブサーバーを経由して、当社のウェブサイト上の要求されたページが表示されます。当社は、このクリックスルーデータを追跡して特定のトピックに対するお客様の関心度を把握し、お客様とのコミュニケーションの効果を測定しています。このような追跡を希望されない場合は、メールメッセージに含まれるテキストリンクやグラフィックリンクをクリックしないでください。ピクセルタグを使用することで、お客様が読み取れる形式でメールメッセージを送信したり、お客様がメールを開いたかどうかを確認することができます。当社は、これらの情報を使用して、お客様に送るメッセージを削減または除去することがあります。
第三者への開示について
BeLight Software は、製品やサービスの提供に関して BeLight Software に協力したり、お客様への宣伝に関して BeLight Software を支援したりする戦略パートナー企業に対して、一定の個人情報を提供することがあります。BeLight Software は、当社の製品、サービスおよび広告の提供または向上のために個人情報を共有しますが、第三者の販売活動のために第三者と個人情報を共有することはありません。
サービスプロバイダ
BeLight Software は、情報処理、注文の履行、製品の配達およびお客様のデータの管理と拡充、カスタマーサービスの提供、製品およびサービスに対するお客様の関心度の評価、顧客調査や満足度調査などのサービスを提供する企業と個人情報を共有します。それらの企業は、お客様の情報を保護する義務を負っています。
当社が利用するサービスおよび各社のプライバシーポリシー:
Google Analytics では、ウェブサイト訪問者の動向や活動を分析します
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube では、ビデオコンテンツを再生します：
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo では、ビデオコンテンツを再生します：
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring では、オンライン注文の処理を行います：
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle では、オンライン注文の処理を行います：
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius では、アフィリエイトトラフィックを当社製品に送るウェブサイトによって生成された販売情報を追跡します：
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Trimble 3D Warehouse サービスでは、3D モデルのオンラインストレージへのユーザアクセスを提供します：
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
YouTube API Services では、ウォークスルービデオを YouTube にアップロードします：
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev では、ソフトウェア内のユーザの動向情報を収集および分析します：
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
その他
お客様の居住国内外において、法律、法的手続き、訴訟および／または公的あるいは政府機関からの要求により、BeLight Software がお客様の個人情報を開示することが必要になる場合があります。また、当社は、当社の利用規約の履行または当社の運営もしくはユーザの保護のために、開示が合理的に必要であると判断した場合、お客様に関する情報を開示することがあります。さらに、組織再編、合併、または売却に際し、当社が収集した個人情報の全部または一部を関係者に移転することがあります。
個人情報の保護について
BeLight Software は、お客様の個人情報のセキュリティを非常に重視しています。BeLight Software Online ウェブサイトストアや、ソフトウェアに組み込まれたストアなどの BeLight Software オンラインサービスでは、Transport Layer Security （TLS）などの暗号化を使用して、転送時にお客様の個人情報を保護します。お客様の個人データを BeLight Software が保管する場合、当社は、アクセスが制限されたコンピュータシステムおよび暗号化されたストレージを使用します。
お客様が一部の BeLight Software 製品、サービスまたはアプリケーションを使用する場合、または BeLight Software フォーラム、チャットルーム、またはソーシャルネットワーキングサービスに投稿する場合、お客様が共有する個人情報およびコンテンツは他のユーザにも公開され、他のユーザが閲覧、収集または使用することが可能になります。このような場合に、お客様が共有または提供される個人情報については、お客様ご自身が責任を負うことになります。
個人情報の完全性および保存について
BeLight Software は、適用法令に基づきより長期間の保存が要求または許容されない限り、本プライバシーに関する声明の目的を達成するために必要な期間中お客様の個人情報を保存します。
個人情報へのアクセス
アクセス、訂正または削除を希望される場合は、次の宛先にメールでご連絡ください：
info@belightsoft.com
お子様の個人情報について
当社は、13歳未満または該当する管轄区域の最低年齢未満のお子様の個人情報を収集したことを認識した場合、できるだけ早急に当該情報を削除します。
保護者の方は、次の宛先にメールでご連絡ください：
info@belightsoft.com
第三者のサイトおよびサービスについて
BeLight Software のウェブサイト、製品、アプリケーション、およびサービスには、第三者のウェブサイト、製品およびサービスへのリンクが含まれることがあります。また、当社の製品およびサービスで、第三者の製品またはサービスを使用または提供することもあります。所在地データまたは連絡先の詳細などが含まれている可能性のある第三者が収集する情報は、第三者のプライバシーポリシーにより管理されています。当該第三者のプライバシーポリシーを確認されることをお勧めします。
プライバシー保護のための取り組みについて
お客様の個人情報の安全性を保持するために、当社は BeLight Software の従業員にプライバシーおよび安全性のガイドラインを伝達し、社内でのプライバシー保護対策を徹底しています。
ご質問
BeLight Software のプライバシーに関する声明またはデータ処理に関して質問や懸念がある場合、または地域のプライバシー法の違反の可能性について苦情を申し立てる場合は、次の宛先にメールでご連絡ください：
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software は、プライバシーに関する声明を随時更新します。プライバシーポリシーの重要な変更は、最新のプライバシーに関する声明とともに当社ウェブサイトに掲載します。
BeLight Software 隐私声明
我们重视您的隐私权。此“隐私声明”阐明了我们如何收集、使用、披露、传输和存储您的信息。
个人信息的收集和使用
个人信息指可用来识别或联系某一个人的数据。
您联系 BeLight Software 时，我们随时可能请您提供个人信息。我们可依据此“隐私声明”共享和使用该信息。我们还可能将该信息与其他信息结合，以便提供和改善产品、服务、内容和广告。我们向您询问个人信息时，您可以不提供。但在很多情况下，不提供个人信息，我们就无法向您提供产品或服务，或回答您的问题。
我们收集哪些个人信息：
您购买产品、下载软件或更新、注册公司或产品简报、联系我们或参加网上调查时，我们可能收集一系列信息，包括您的姓名、邮政地址、电话号码、电邮地址。
我们如何使用个人信息：
通过收集个人信息，我们可让您及时获得 BeLight Software 的最新产品公告、软件更新和即将举办的活动。如果您不想加入我们的邮件列表，可随时选择退出，请发邮件至：
news@belightsoft.com
我们还使用个人信息帮助创建、开发、运营、交付和改善产品、服务、内容和广告，并用于防损目的。
我们可能使用您的个人信息来验证身份、协助验证用户身份和确定适当的服务。
我们有时可能使用您的个人信息发送重要通知，如：有关购买和条款、条件及政策变化的通信。由于此信息对您与 BeLight Software 互动很重要，因此您不能选择退出接收这些通信。
我们还将个人信息用于内部目的，如：审核、数据分析和研究，以改善 BeLight Software 产品、服务和客户通信。
如果您参加抽奖、比赛或相似的推广活动，我们可能使用您提供的信息管理这些计划。
非个人信息的收集和使用
我们收集数据的形式本身也不允许与任何特定个人直接关联。 以下示例向您说明我们收集哪些非个人信息及如何使用该信息：
我们可能收集 BeLight Software 产品使用者的职业、语言、邮码、区号、设备唯一标识、来源网址、位置和时区，以便更好的了解客户行为，并改善产品、服务和广告。
我们可能收集客户在我们的网站或来自我们其他产品及服务的活动信息。此信息经过汇总，用于帮助我们为客户提供更有用的信息和了解客户对我们网站、产品和服务的哪个部分最有兴趣。依据此“隐私声明”，汇总数据属于非个人信息。
在您许可下，我们可能收集有关软件使用及用户在使用软件时的行为信息和统计数据。我们将在内部使用该数据，以了解如何改进软件与用户体验。您可随时通过 iOS/iPadOS 上的应用设置和 macOS 上的应用首选项，取消软件使用统计数据的收集许可。（Windows 和 Android 系统没有搜集软件使用情况统计信息。)
如果我们将非个人信息与个人信息结合，那么只要该信息的结合状态不变，此结合信息即按个人信息对待。
Cookie 和其他技术
BeLight Software 网站、在线服务、互动应用程序、电邮信息和广告可能使用“cookie”和其他技术，如：像素代码和 Web 信号。这些技术帮助我们更好地了解用户行为，告诉我们访客访问了网站的哪些部分，同时协助和测量广告与网络搜索的效果。我们按非个人信息对待由 cookie 和其他技术收集的信息。但如果当地法律将 Internet 协议 (IP) 地址或相似标识信息认作个人信息，我们也会按个人信息对待这些标识信息。与此相似，如果非个人信息与个人信息相结合，我们会依据此“隐私声明”以个人信息对待结合的信息。
如果您想禁用 cookie，并在使用 Safari 网络浏览器，请前往 Safari 首选项，然后进入隐私窗格，来管理首选项。如果您使用其他浏览器，请咨询提供商，了解如何禁用 cookie。请注意，禁用 cookie 后，BeLight Software 网站的某些功能将无法使用。
与大多数 Internet 服务一样，我们自动收集某些信息，并将其存储在日志文件中。该信息包括 Internet 协议 (IP) 地址、浏览器类型和语言、Internet 服务提供商 (ISP)、来源和退出网站及应用程序、操作系统、日期/时间戳和点击流数据。
我们使用该信息了解和分析趋势、管理网站、了解用户在网站上的行为、改善产品与服务并收集整体用户群的人口统计信息。BeLight Software 可能在市场营销和广告服务中使用该信息。
在某些电邮信息中，我们使用链接到 BeLight Software 网站的“点击通过网址”。客户点击这些网址时，会先通过另一个的网站服务器，然后才到达我们网站的目标页面。我们追踪此“点击通过”数据，以帮助确定客户对特定主题的兴趣并测量客户通信的效果。如果您不喜欢这种追踪方式，则不应点击电邮信息中的文本或图片链接。像素代码使我们能向客户发送可阅读的电邮信息，同时这些代码告诉我们邮件是否已被打开。我们可能使用该信息减少或避免向客户发送消息。
向第三方作出的披露
BeLight Software 有时可能向策略合作方提供某些个人信息，这些第三方与 BeLight Software 合作，以提供产品和服务，或帮助 BeLight Software 向客户做市场推广。BeLight Software 仅在提供或改善产品、服务和广告时共享个人信息；该信息不会为第三方的市场营销目的而共享。
服务提供商
BeLight Software 与提供以下服务的公司共享个人信息：信息处理、履行客户订单、向您交付产品、管理和改善客户数据、提供客户服务、了解您对我们产品与服务的兴趣及进行客户研究或满意度调查。这些公司有义务保护您的信息。
我们使用的服务及其相应的隐私政策：
Google Analytics 用来分析网站访客行为和行动：
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube 用于播放视频内容
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo 用于播放视频内容
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring 用于在线处理订单：
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle 用于在线处理订单：
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius 用于追踪向我们的产品发送联盟流量的网站所产生的销售：
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Trimble 3D Warehouse 服务用来向用户提供 3D 模型在线存储的访问：
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
YouTube API 服务用于将走查视频上传到 YouTube：
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev 是用于收集和分析软件内用户行为的解决方案：
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
其他
根据法律、法律程序、诉讼及/或受您居住国内外公众或政府机关要求，BeLight Software 可能必须披露您的个人信息。为执行条款和条件，或为保护我们的运营或用户，如果我们决定有合理必要披露个人信息，则也会披露有关您的信息。此外，在发生重组、兼并或出售的情况下，我们可能将收集的任何及全部个人信息传输给相关第三方。
对个人信息的保护
BeLight Software 非常重视您的个人信息安全。BeLight Software 线上服务，如：BeLight Software 网站商店及软件内商店，在传输个人信息时使用诸如“传输层安全性”(TLS) 技术保护您的个人信息。BeLight Software 存储您的个人信息时，使用具有访问限制和加密存储的计算机系统。
当您使用某些 BeLight Software 产品、服务或应用程序，或在 BeLight Software 论坛、聊天室或社交网络服务发布内容时，其他用户可访问您分享的个人信息和内容，并可阅读、收集或使用这些信息。您对在这些情况下分享或提交的个人信息负责。
个人信息的完整性和保留
除非法律要求或允许更长的保留时间，BeLight Software 将为满足此“隐私声明”所述目的，以必要的时长保留您的个人信息。
访问个人信息
访问、更正或删除个人信息的请求可通过电邮发送到：
info@belightsoft.com
儿童
如果我们得知收集的个人信息涉及 13 岁以下儿童（或管辖权规定的相应最低年龄），则将采取措施尽快将该信息删除。
家长可通过电邮联系我们：
info@belightsoft.com
第三方网站和服务
BeLight Software 网站、产品、应用程序和服务可能含有第三方网站、产品和服务的链接。我们的产品和服务还可能使用或提供来自第三方的产品或服务。由第三方收集的信息（可能包括位置数据或联系信息）由其隐私政策管辖。我们建议您了解一下这些第三方的隐私政策。
对个人隐私的承诺
为确保个人信息安全，我们向 BeLight Software 员工传达了隐私和安全准则，并在公司内严格施行隐私安全保障。
问题
如果您对 BeLight Software“隐私声明”或数据处理有任何问题或顾虑，或对可能违反当地隐私法律的情况进行投诉，请联系我们：
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software 可能不定期更新其“隐私声明”。当我们对政策有重大改变时，会在网站发布通知与更新的“隐私声明”。
Заява про конфіденційність BeLight Software
Ваша конфіденційність є важливою для нас. У цій заяві про конфіденційність описується, як ми збираємо, використовуємо, передаємо та зберігаємо вашу інформацію.
Збір та використання персональних даних
Персональні дані — це дані, які можна використовувати для ідентифікації або контакту з людиною.
Вас можуть попросити надати персональні дані в будь-який час, коли ви вступаєте в контакт з BeLight Software. Ми можемо використовувати ці дані відповідно до цієї заяви про конфіденційність. Ми можемо також об'єднувати їх з іншою інформацією для забезпечення та покращення наших продуктів, послуг, контенту та реклами. Ви не зобов'язані надавати персональні дані, які ми запросили, але якщо ви цього не зробили, у багатьох випадках ми не зможемо надати вам наші продукти або послуги, а також відповідати на ваші питання.
Які персональні дані ми збираємо:
Коли ви купуєте продукт, завантажуєте програмне забезпечення або оновлення, підписуєтеся на розсилку новин компанії або продукту, контактуєте з нами або берете участь в онлайн-опитуванні, ми можемо збирати різну інформацію, включаючи ваше ім'я, поштову адресу, номер телефону, адресу електронної пошти.
Як ми використовуємо ваші персональні дані:
Персональні дані, які ми збираємо, дозволяють нам публікувати повідомлення про поточні версії продуктів, оновлення програмного забезпечення та майбутні події в BeLight Software. Якщо ви бажаєте видалити вашу адресу з нашого списку розсилки, відмовитися отримувати яку ви можете в будь-який час, надішліть нам повідомлення про відписку на електронну пошту:
news@belightsoft.com
Ми також використовуємо персональні дані при створенні, розробці, управлінні, постачанні та вдосконаленні наших продуктів, послуг, контенту та реклами, а також для запобігання втраті даних.
Ми можемо використовувати персональні дані для перевірки особистості, допомоги в ідентифікації користувачів та визначення відповідних послуг.
Час від часу ми можемо використовувати ваші персональні дані для надсилання важливих повідомлень, таких як повідомлення про покупки та зміни наших умов та політики конфіденційності. Оскільки ця інформація є важливою для взаємодії з програмою BeLight Software, ви не можете відмовитися від отримання цих повідомлень.
Ми також можемо використовувати персональні дані для внутрішніх цілей, таких як аудит, аналіз даних та дослідження для покращення продуктів BeLight Software, послуг та комунікації з клієнтами.
Якщо ви берете участь у лотереї, конкурсі або подібних акціях, що проводяться BeLight Software, ми можемо використовувати надану вами інформацію для адміністрування цих акцій.
Збір та використання неперсональних даних
Ми також можемо збирати дані у формі, яка сама по собі не може бути безпосередньо пов'язана з якоюсь конкретною особою. Ми можемо збирати, використовувати, передавати і розкривати неперсональні дані для різних цілей. Нижче наведено деякі приклади неперсональних даних, які ми збираємо, і те, як ми можемо їх використовувати:
Ми можемо збирати дані, такі як вид діяльності, мова, поштовий індекс, унікальний ідентифікатор пристрою, URL-адреса, місцезнаходження та часовий пояс, в яких використовується продукт BeLight Software, щоб ми могли краще розуміти поведінку клієнтів та покращувати наші продукти, послуги та рекламу.
Ми можемо збирати дані про активність користувачів на наших веб-сайтах та інших наших продуктах і послугах. Ці дані збираються та використовуються, щоб допомогти нам надати більш корисну інформацію нашим клієнтам та зрозуміти, які розділи нашого веб-сайту, продуктів та послуг становлять найбільший інтерес. Зібрані дані вважаються неперсональними в рамках цієї заяви про конфіденційність.
Тільки з дозволу користувача ми можемо збирати інформацію та статистику про використання програмного забезпечення та поведінку користувачів під час використання програмного забезпечення. Ми будемо використовувати ці дані для внутрішніх цілей, щоб зрозуміти, як покращити наше програмне забезпечення та покращити взаємодію з користувачем. У будь-який момент користувач може відкликати дозвіл на збір статистики програмного забезпечення в налаштуваннях програми на iOS/iPadOS та в налаштуваннях програми на macOS. (Статистика використання програмного забезпечення не збирається на Windows та Android.)
Якщо ми об'єднуємо неперсональні дані з персональними даними, об'єднані дані розглядатимуться як персональні дані доти, доки залишатимуться об'єднаними.
Файли cookie та інші технології
Сайти BeLight Software, онлайн-сервіси, інтерактивні програми, повідомлення електронної пошти та рекламні оголошення можуть використовувати файли cookie та інші технології, такі як піксельні мітки та веб-маяки. Ці технології допомагають нам краще зрозуміти поведінку користувачів, отримати інформацію про те, які розділи наших веб-сайтів відвідують користувачі, а також підвищити та виміряти ефективність реклами та веб-пошуку. Ми розглядаємо інформацію, зібрану за допомогою файлів cookie та інших технологій, як неперсональні дані. Однак, якщо адреси інтернет-протоколу (IP) або аналогічні ідентифікатори вважаються персональними даними згідно з місцевим законодавством, ми також розглядаємо ці ідентифікатори як персональні дані. Аналогічно, в тій мірі, в якій неперсональні дані об'єднуються з персональними даними, ми розглядаємо об'єднані дані як персональні дані для цілей цієї заяви про конфіденційність.
Якщо ви бажаєте вимкнути файли cookie та є користувачом веб-браузера Safari, перейдіть до параметрів Safari, а потім до панелі конфіденційності, щоб керувати налаштуваннями. Для інших браузерів зверніться до відповідного розробника, щоб дізнатися, як вимкнути файли cookie. Зверніть увагу, що деякі функції веб-сайту BeLight Software не будуть доступні після вимкнення файлів cookie.
Як і більшість інтернет-сервісів, ми збираємо деяку інформацію автоматично та зберігаємо її у лог файлах. Ця інформація включає адреси інтернет-протоколу (IP), тип і мову браузера, інформацію про провайдера інтернет-послуг (ISP), переходи між сайтами та додатками, операційну систему, дату / час і дані про переходи між сторінками.
Ми використовуємо цю інформацію для розуміння та аналізу тенденцій, адміністрування сайту, вивчення поведінки користувача на сайті, покращення нашого продукту та послуг, а також збору демографічної інформації про нашу базу користувачів. Програмне забезпечення BeLight може використовувати цю інформацію під час проведення маркетингових та рекламних дій.
У деяких електронних повідомленнях ми використовуємо «URL переходу по кліку», пов'язаний з контентом на веб-сайті BeLight Software. Коли клієнти натискають одну з цих URL-адрес, вони проходять через окремий веб-сервер перед тим, як прибути на сторінку призначення на нашому веб-сайті. Ми відстежуємо дані переходів як допоміжну інформацію для визначення інтересу до конкретних тем та оцінки ефективності наших клієнтських комунікацій. Якщо ви не бажаєте, щоб вас відстежували таким чином, ви не повинні натискати текстові або графічні посилання в електронних повідомленнях. Піксельні теги дозволяють надсилати повідомлення електронної пошти у форматі, який можуть читати клієнти, і передають нам, чи було відкрито повідомлення. Ми можемо використовувати цю інформацію для зменшення частоти або припинення надсилання повідомлень нашим клієнтам.
Розкриття інформації третім особам
Час від часу BeLight Software може надавати певні персональні дані стратегічним партнерам, які працюють з BeLight Software для надання продуктів та послуг, або які допомагають BeLight Software працювати з клієнтами. Персональні дані будуть доступні лише BeLight Software для надання або покращення наших продуктів, послуг та реклами; вони не будуть передані третім сторонам у маркетингових цілях.
Постачальники послуг
BeLight Software ділиться персональними даними з компаніями, які надають такі послуги, як обробка інформації, виконання замовлень клієнтів, надання вам продуктів, управління та покращення даних про клієнтів, надання послуг клієнтам, оцінка вашої зацікавленості в наших продуктах та послугах, а також проведення досліджень клієнтів або опитувань для вивчення рівня задоволеності. Ці компанії повинні захищати вашу інформацію.
Сервіси, що використовуються BeLight Software, та їх політики конфіденційності:
Google аналітика використовується для аналізу поведінки та активності відвідувачів сайту:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube використовується для відтворення відеоконтенту:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo використовується для відтворення відеоконтенту:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring може використовуватись для обробки замовлень:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle може використовуватись для обробки замовлень:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius використовується для відстеження продажів, що генеруються веб-сайтами, які спрямовують партнерський трафік на наші продукти:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Trimble 3D Warehouse використовується для надання користувачам доступу до онлайн-сховища 3D-моделей:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
YouTube API Services використовується для завантаження відео ролика на YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev використовується для збирання та аналізу поведінки користувачів у програмному забезпеченні:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Інші випадки
Може виникнути потреба — за законом, у зв'язку з судовим процесом, судовим розглядом та/або на вимогу державних та урядових органів у вашій країні проживання та за її межами – для BeLight Software розкрити ваші персональні дані. Ми також можемо розкрити інформацію про вас, якщо ми визначимо, що розкриття інформації є розумним для забезпечення дотримання наших умов або захисту наших операцій чи користувачів. Крім того, у разі реорганізації, злиття або продажу ми можемо передавати будь-які персональні дані, які ми збираємо, відповідній третій стороні.
Захист персональних даних
BeLight Software дуже серйозно ставиться до безпеки ваших персональних даних. Інтернет-сервіси BeLight Software, такі як онлайн магазин і вбудований у програмне забезпечення магазин, захищають ваші персональні дані під час передачі даних з використанням шифрування, такого як Transport Layer Security (TLS). Для зберігання ваших персональних даних BeLight Software використовує комп'ютерні системи з обмеженим доступом і зашифрованими сховищами.
Коли ви використовуєте деякі продукти, служби або програми BeLight Software, публікуєте повідомлення на форумі BeLight Software, у чаті або в сервісах соціальних мереж, персональні дані та контент, які ви повідомляєте, помітні іншим користувачам і можуть бути прочитані, зібрані або використані ними. Ви несете відповідальність за персональні дані, якими ви вирішили поділитися або подати у цих випадках.
Цілісність та зберігання персональних даних
BeLight Software зберігає ваші персональні дані протягом періоду, необхідного для виконання цілей, викладених у цій заяві про конфіденційність, за винятком випадків, коли законом вимагається або дозволено більш тривалий термін зберігання.
Доступ до персональних даних
Запити на доступ, виправлення або видалення можуть бути надіслані електронною поштою:
info@belightsoft.com
Діти
Якщо ми дізнаємося, що ми зібрали персональні дані про дитину віком до 13 років або еквівалентний мінімальний вік залежно від юрисдикції, ми вживемо заходів для того, щоб якнайшвидше видалити цю інформацію.
Батьки можуть зв'язатися з нами електронною поштою:
info@belightsoft.com
Сторонні сайти та служби
Веб-сайти, продукти, програми та служби BeLight Software можуть містити посилання на інші веб-сайти, продукти та послуги. Наші продукти та послуги також можуть використовувати або пропонувати продукти або послуги від третіх осіб. Інформація, зібрана третіми особами, яка може включати такі дані, як дані про місцезнаходження або контактні дані, регулюється їхньою політикою конфіденційності. Ми рекомендуємо ознайомитися з політикою конфіденційності третіх сторін.
Зобов'язання щодо вашої конфіденційності
Щоб переконатися, що ваші персональні дані зберігаються в безпеці, ми повідомляємо наші правила конфіденційності та безпеки співробітникам BeLight Software і суворо дотримуємося гарантій конфіденційності в компанії.
Питання
Якщо у вас є питання стосовно політики конфіденційності BeLight Software або обробки даних, а також, якщо ви хочете подати скаргу про можливе порушення місцевих законів про конфіденційність, зв'яжіться з нами за адресою:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software може час від часу оновлювати свою заяву про конфіденційність. У разі внесення значних змін до заяви про конфіденційність, на нашому веб-сайті буде опубліковано повідомлення про оновлення та змінену заяву про конфіденційність.
Заявление о конфиденциальности BeLight Software
Ваша конфиденциальность важна для нас. В этом заявлении о конфиденциальности описывается, как мы собираем, используем, передаем и храним вашу информацию.
Сбор и использование персональных данных
Персональные данные — это данные, которые могут использоваться для идентификации или контакта с человеком.
Вас могут попросить предоставить ваши персональные данные в любое время, когда вы вступаете в контакт с BeLight Software. Мы можем использовать эти данные в соответствии с настоящим заявлением о конфиденциальности. Мы можем также объединять их с другой информацией для обеспечения и улучшения наших продуктов, услуг, контента и рекламы. Вы не обязаны предоставлять персональные данные, которые мы запросили, но, если вы этого не сделали, во многих случаях мы не сможем предоставить вам наши продукты или услуги, а также отвечать на ваши вопросы.
Какие персональные данные мы собираем:
Когда вы приобретаете продукт, загружаете программное обеспечение или обновление, подписываетесь на новостную рассылку компании или продукта, контактируете нас или участвуете в онлайн-опросе, мы можем собирать различную информацию, включая ваше имя, почтовый адрес, номер телефона, адрес электронной почты.
Как мы используем ваши персональные данные:
Персональные данные, которые мы собираем, позволяют нам публиковать сообщения о текущих версиях продуктов, обновлениях программного обеспечения и предстоящих событиях в BeLight Software. Если вы хотите удалить ваш имейл адрес из нашего списка рассылки, отказаться получать которую вы можете в любое время, отправьте нам уведомление об отписке на электронную почту:
news@belightsoft.com
Мы также используем персональные данные при создании, разработке, управлении, поставке и совершенствовании наших продуктов, услуг, контента и рекламы, а также для предотвращения потери данных.
Мы можем использовать ваши персональные данные для проверки личности, помощи в идентификации пользователей и определения соответствующих услуг.
Время от времени мы можем использовать ваши персональные данные для отправки важных уведомлений, таких как сообщения о покупках и изменения наших условий и политики конфиденциальности. Поскольку эта информация важна для вашего взаимодействия с BeLight Software, вы не можете отказаться от получения этих сообщений.
Мы также можем использовать персональные данные для внутренних целей, таких как аудит, анализ данных и исследования для улучшения продуктов BeLight Software, услуг и коммуникации с клиентами.
Если вы участвуете в лотерее, конкурсе или подобных акциях, проводимых BeLight Software, мы можем использовать предоставленную вами информацию для администрирования этих акций.
Сбор и использование неперсональных данных
Мы также можем собирать данные в форме, которая сама по себе не может быть напрямую связана с каким-либо конкретным лицом. Мы можем собирать, использовать, передавать и раскрывать неперсональные данные для различных целей. Ниже приведены некоторые примеры неперсональных данных, которую мы собираем и как мы можем их использовать:
Мы можем собирать данные, такие как вид деятельности, язык, почтовый индекс, уникальный идентификатор устройства, URL-адрес, местоположение и часовой пояс, в которых используется продукт BeLight Software, чтобы мы могли лучше понимать поведение клиентов и улучшать наши продукты, услуги и рекламу.
Мы можем собирать данные об активности пользователей на наших веб-сайтах и в других наших продуктах и услугах. Эти данные собираются и используются, чтобы помочь нам предоставить более полезную информацию нашим клиентам и понять, какие разделы нашего веб-сайта, продуктов и услуг представляют наибольший интерес. Собранные данные считаются неперсональными в рамках настоящего заявления о конфиденциальности.
Только с разрешения пользователя мы можем собирать информацию и статистику об использовании программного обеспечения и поведении пользователей при использовании программного обеспечения. Мы будем использовать эти данные для внутренних целей, чтобы понять, как улучшить наше программное обеспечение и улучшить взаимодействие с пользователем. В любой момент пользователь можете отозвать разрешение на сбор статистики программного обеспечения в настройках приложения на iOS / iPadOS и в настройках приложения на macOS. (Статистика об использовании программного обеспечения не собирается на Windows и Android.)
Если мы объединяем неперсональные данные с персональными данными, объединенные данные будут рассматриваться как персональные данные до тех пор, пока будут оставаться объединенными.
Файлы cookie и другие технологии
Сайты BeLight Software, онлайн-сервисы, интерактивные приложения, сообщения электронной почты и рекламные объявления могут использовать файлы cookie и другие технологии, такие как пиксельные метки и веб-маяки. Эти технологии помогают нам лучше понять поведение пользователей, получить информацию о том, какие разделы наших веб-сайтов посещают пользователи, а также облегчить и измерить эффективность рекламы и веб-поиска. Мы рассматриваем информацию, собранную с помощью файлов cookie и других технологий, как неперсональные данные. Однако, в случае, если адреса интернет-протокола (IP) или аналогичные идентификаторы считаются персональными данными согласно местному законодательству, мы также рассматриваем эти идентификаторы как персональные данные. Аналогичным образом, в той мере, в которой неперсональные данные объединяются с персональными данными, мы рассматриваем объединенные данные как персональные данные для целей настоящего заявления о конфиденциальности.
Если вы хотите отключить файлы cookie, и являетесь пользователем веб-браузера Safari, перейдите в настройки Safari, а затем в панель конфиденциальности, чтобы управлять своими настройками. Для других браузеров обратитесь к соответствующему разработчику, чтобы узнать, как отключить файлы cookie. Обратите внимание, что некоторые функции веб-сайта BeLight Software не будут доступны после отключения файлов cookie.
Как и большинство интернет-сервисов, мы собираем некоторую информацию автоматически и храним ее в лог файлах. Эта информация включает в себя адреса интернет-протокола (IP), тип и язык браузера, информацию о провайдере интернет-услуг (ISP), переходы между сайтами и приложениями, операционную систему, дату / время и данные о переходах между страницами.
Мы используем эту информацию для понимания и анализа тенденций, администрирования сайта, изучения поведения пользователя на сайте, улучшения нашего продукта и услуг, а также сбора демографической информации о нашей базе пользователей. Программное обеспечение BeLight может использовать эту информацию при проведении маркетинговых и рекламных действий.
В некоторых электронных сообщениях мы используем «URL перехода по клику», связанный с контентом на веб-сайте BeLight Software. Когда клиенты нажимают один из этих URL-адресов, они проходят через отдельный веб-сервер перед тем, как прибыть на страницу назначения на нашем веб-сайте. Мы отслеживаем данные переходов как вспомогательную информацию для определения интереса к конкретным темам и оценки эффективности наших клиентских коммуникаций. Если вы предпочитаете, чтобы вас не отслеживали таким образом, вы не должны нажимать текстовые или графические ссылки в сообщениях электронной почты. Пиксельные теги позволяют отправлять сообщения электронной почты в формате, который могут читать клиенты, и передают нам, было ли открыто сообщение. Мы можем использовать эту информацию для уменьшения частоты или прекращения отправки сообщений нашим клиентам.
Раскрытие информации третьим лицам
Время от времени BeLight Software может предоставлять определенные персональные данные стратегическим партнерам, которые работают с BeLight Software для предоставления продуктов и услуг, или помогают BeLight Software в работе с клиентами. Персональные данные будут доступны только BeLight Software для предоставления или улучшения наших продуктов, услуг и рекламы; они не будут переданы третьим сторонам в маркетинговых целях.
Поставщики услуг
BeLight Software делится персональными данными с компаниями, которые предоставляют такие услуги, как обработка информации, выполнение заказов клиентов, предоставление вам продуктов, управление и улучшение данных о клиентах, предоставление услуг клиентам, оценка вашей заинтересованности в наших продуктах и услугах, а также проведение исследований клиентов или опросов для изучения уровня удовлетворенности. Эти компании обязаны защищать вашу информацию.
Сервисы, используемые BeLight Software, и их политика конфиденциальности:
Google аналитика используется для анализа поведения и активности посетителей сайта:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
YouTube используется для воспроизведения видеоконтента:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Vimeo используется для воспроизведения видеоконтента:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
FastSpring может использоваться для обработки заказов:
https://fastspring.com/privacy/
Paddle может использоваться для обработки заказов:
https://paddle.com/privacy/
ImpactRadius используется для отслеживания продаж, генерируемых веб-сайтами, которые направляют партнерский трафик на наши продукты:
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/
Trimble 3D Warehouse используется для предоставления пользователям доступа к онлайн-хранилищу 3D-моделей:
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx
YouTube API Services используется для загрузки видео ролика на YouTube:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
Devtodev используется для сбора и анализа поведения пользователей в программном обеспечении:
https://www.devtodev.com/policy
Другие случаи
Может возникнуть необходимость — по закону, в связи с судебным процессом, судебным разбирательством и / или по требованию государственных и правительственных органов в вашей стране проживания и за её пределами — для BeLight Software раскрыть ваши персональные данные. Мы также можем раскрыть информацию о вас, если мы определим, что раскрытие информации является разумным для обеспечения соблюдения наших условий или защиты наших операций или пользователей. Кроме того, в случае реорганизации, слияния или продажи мы можем передавать любые персональные данные, которые мы собираем, соответствующей третьей стороне.
Защита персональных данных
BeLight Software очень серьезно относится к безопасности ваших персональных данных. Интернет-сервисы BeLight Software, такие как онлайн магазин и встроенный в программное обеспечение магазин, защищают ваши персональные данные во время передачи данных с использованием шифрования, такого как Transport Layer Security (TLS). Для хранения ваших персональных данных BeLight Software использует компьютерные системы с ограниченным доступом и зашифрованными хранилищами.
Когда вы используете некоторые продукты, службы или приложения BeLight Software, публикуете сообщения на форуме BeLight Software, в чате или в сервисах социальных сетей, персональные данные и контент, которые вы передаете, видны другим пользователям и могут быть прочитаны, собраны или использованы ими. Вы несете ответственность за персональные данные, которыми вы решили поделиться или предоставить в этих случаях.
Целостность и хранение персональных данных
BeLight Software хранит ваши персональные данные в течение периода, необходимого для выполнения целей, изложенных в настоящем заявлении о конфиденциальности, за исключением случаев, когда требуется или разрешен законом более длительный срок хранения.
Доступ к персональным данным
Запросы на доступ, исправление или удаление могут быть отправлены по электронной почте:
info@belightsoft.com
Дети
Если мы узнаем, что мы собрали персональные данные о ребенке в возрасте до 13 лет или эквивалентном минимальном возрасте в зависимости от юрисдикции, мы предпримем меры для того, чтобы как можно скорее удалить эту информацию.
Родители могут связаться с нами по электронной почте:
info@belightsoft.com
Сторонние сайты и службы
Веб-сайты, продукты, приложения и службы BeLight Software могут содержать ссылки на сторонние веб-сайты, продукты и услуги. Наши продукты и услуги могут также использовать или предлагать продукты или услуги от третьих лиц. Информация, собранная третьими лицами, которая может включать такие данные, как данные о местоположении или контактные данные, регулируется их политикой конфиденциальности. Мы рекомендуем вам ознакомиться с политикой конфиденциальности третьих сторон.
Обязательства по вашей конфиденциальности
Чтобы убедиться, что ваши персональные данные хранятся в безопасности, мы сообщаем наши правила конфиденциальности и безопасности сотрудникам BeLight Software и строго соблюдаем гарантии конфиденциальности в компании.
Вопросы
Если у вас есть какие-либо вопросы касательно политики конфиденциальности BeLight Software или обработки данных, а также, если вы хотите подать жалобу о возможном нарушении местных законов о конфиденциальности, свяжитесь с нами по адресу:
info@belightsoft.com
BeLight Software может время от времени обновлять свое заявление о конфиденциальности. В случае внесения значительных изменений в заявление о конфиденциальности, на нашем веб-сайте будет опубликовано уведомление об обновлении и изменённое заявление о конфиденциальности.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://vimeo.com/privacy:
Solutions
Video marketing
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Event marketing
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Employee communication
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Video monetization
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Create
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Manage
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Grow
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
DEMO VIDEOS
Get to know everything Vimeo can do for your business.
Watch now
Resources
Learn
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Connect
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Best of the Year
Browse Videos
Staff Picks
Categories
Channels
On Demand
Pricing
Contact Sales
Log in
Join
Help
Pricing
Log in
Join
Settings
Language
Mature content filter
Watch
More
Vimeo OTT
On Demand
Stock
Vimeo Experts
For Hire
Referrals
Legal
Terms
Privacy
U.S. State Privacy
Copyright
Cookies
Log in
Join
Login
Solutions
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
Resources
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Pricing
Contact Sales
Search
Search
Upload
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Copyright
Cookies
Desktop site
Language
English
Español
Deutsch
Français
日本語
Português
한국어
FAQ
Help
TM + © 2025 Vimeo.com, Inc.
Sub-policy 2
https://fastspring.com/privacy/:
Get more than a payment gateway, right out of the gate. Go farther faster with FastSpring.
Schedule Demo
or
Try Now
FastSpring® Privacy Statement
Please note:
This is the FastSpring Privacy Policy. There is also a separate privacy policy for FastSpring Interactive Quotes (formerly SalesRight) which
you can access here
.
California residents and individuals located in the European Economic Area (EEA), the United Kingdom (UK) and Switzerland can exercise their privacy rights, including the right to request access to or deletion of their personal information, subject to the exceptions under applicable law, by clicking
here
and then completing the form to submit their request.
You may find a copy of this Privacy Policy in PDF format
here
.  For individuals with disabilities, alternative methods of viewing or receiving this Privacy Policy can be found
here
.
BY USING THIS WEBSITE OR ANY FASTSPRING OPERATED ECOMMERCE SOLUTION OR SUBMITTING PERSONAL INFORMATION TO FASTSPRING THROUGH THIS WEBSITE OR ANY FASTSPRING POWERED ECOMMERCE SOLUTION, YOU ARE CONSENTING TO THE COLLECTION, USE, TRANSFER, AND DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION AS DESCRIBED IN THIS PRIVACY STATEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO ABIDE BY THIS PRIVACY STATEMENT, DO NOT USE THIS WEBSITE. YOUR CONTINUED USE OF THE WEBSITE FOLLOWING THE POSTING OF ANY CHANGES TO THIS STATEMENT CONSTITUTES ACCEPTANCE OF SUCH CHANGES.
1. Scope and Purpose of This Privacy Statement.
Introduction.
This Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring (“
FastSpring
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) Privacy Statement (“
Privacy Statement
”) applies to each ecommerce solution, which may be but is not limited to, a website, portion of a website or a software application branded with the look and feel of a software publisher or entity operated by FastSpring for the purpose of buying or selling such software publisher’s products and/or services (“
Ecommerce Engine
” or “
Website
”) where this Privacy Statement can be accessed from a hyperlink on, or otherwise appears on, that Ecommerce Engine.  If you are purchasing products through a software Seller (“
Vendor
”), a FastSpring subsidiary and not FastSpring directly, please note that this Ecommerce Engine is hosted and/or operated by FastSpring under an agreement with the Vendor or subsidiary of FastSpring who is listed as the seller of products in the terms of sale on this Ecommerce Engine.
Controller Responsible for Your Information.
Depending upon your relationship to us, FastSpring operates as either a joint controller or processor of the Personal Information we maintain about you.  For additional information on the distinction between the two roles, please see our
Data Processing Agreement
.  Any Personal Information collected by visiting this Website is controlled by Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring, 801 Garden Street, #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America.
Purpose.
FastSpring respects the privacy of its customers, partners and suppliers of products or services. The purpose of this Privacy Statement is to provide you with information concerning how FastSpring collects, uses, maintains, and shares your Personal Information in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
2. Information We Collect and Process.
FastSpring collects the Personal Information of our purchasers, Vendors, and other individuals who visit our Website for specified, explicit purposes only and will not process this Personal Information in a manner that is incompatible with those purposes.  Personal Information will be processed only if such processing is based on any of the legal grounds listed in section 6(1) of the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR) (unless an exemption applies) as outlined below:
Performance of a Contract with You
. We will process your Personal Information if it is necessary in order to enter into or perform a contract with you. For example, we will process your payment information in order to complete your purchase/sales transaction.
Legitimate Interest
.  We will process your Personal Information if it is necessary for the purposes of FastSpring’s legitimate interests, except where FastSpring’s interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms that require protection of your Personal Information. FastSpring’s legitimate interests in processing your Personal Information include:  FastSpring’s prevention of fraud or misuse of services, IT and network security, marketing and advertising of products sold by FastSpring, enforcement of legal claims including debt collection via out-of-court procedures, processing for marketing research purposes.
Consent
. If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, by using this Ecommerce Engine you consent by ticking the specific consent box to the processing of your Personal Information FastSpring’s servers in the United States and the storage of your Personal Information in the United States for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement, and acknowledge that your Personal Information may be transmitted by us to other FastSpring companies for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement and for company group administration purposes. You may withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future, but you will then not be able to use our services and in particular order products on our Websites. Where consent to the collection of Personal Information is revoked, we will stop processing that Personal Information. For further information or if you wish to withdraw your consent, please email us at
privacy@fastspring.com
.
Legal Obligation
. We will process your Personal Information where we are under a legal obligation to do so, including tax compliance obligations.
When you visit, buy, or sell via our Website, we may capture the following information about you:
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Identifiers
Specific Personal Information
Name (First/Last), Signature/E-Signature, Mailing Address, Email Address, Telephone Number(s), IP Address, Driver’s License Number/Other Government Number (GST/VAT), Tax Exemption Status, Bank Account Numbers, Debit/Credit Card Number & Information, Customer Identification.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Account/Mailing List Registration, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies, Transaction Details You Provide to Our Customer Service Teams, Information We Receive from Vendors.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sales Transactions, Customer Service Issues, Marketing, Legal and Regulatory Obligations
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Internet or Other Similar Network Activity
Specific Personal Information
Browsing History, Search History, Other Information Related to Our Consumer’s Interactions with Our Website, Application, and/or Advertisements, including (1) Buyer Usage Activities (adding/removing products from checkout; currency used for purchase) and Analytics, (2) Vendor Platform Usage Activities (submissions, clicks on navigation links, video usage and duration, page views, search requests, time spent on page, cursor movement, clicks on any “get support” or “sign up” buttons) and Analytics.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies, Third Party Sources.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions, Marketing, Understand Our Customers, Improve Our Products/Usage and Data Analytics.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Commercial Information
Specific Personal Information
Records of Products or Services Purchased, Obtained, or Considered.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Geolocation Data
Specific Personal Information
Location of the Individual and Device Used to Access Our Website.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Account/Mailing List Registration, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions, Marketing, Legal and Regulatory Obligations.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Marketing Communications
.  We may send you email marketing communication about FastSpring products and services, invite you to participate in our events or surveys, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, provided that we do so in accordance with the consent requirements that are imposed by applicable law. You may opt out of receiving marketing communication at any time.
Our Use of Anonymous Information.
We may use anonymous information (i.e. information that does not allow direct or indirect identification of the individual to whom such information relates) collected by us:
to personalize and support your use of this Ecommerce Engine, our services, and/or the services of our partners;
to improve this Ecommerce Engine, the customer experience, our advertising systems, and our products and services;
for fraud prevention purposes, such as device fingerprinting;
to identify actions or transactions as originating through an affiliate marketing or referral program;
to deliver targeted advertisements on this Ecommerce Engine and other Websites and/or ecommerce solutions;
to provide reporting to our current and prospective partners and service providers; and
for statistical or research and analysis purposes.
In addition, we may anonymize Personal Information by removing any information that identifies you specifically, and use the rest for the purposes set forth above.
3. Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies.
A cookie is a commonly used automated data collection tool. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or device by websites that you visit or HTML-formatted emails you open, in order to make websites work, or to work more efficiently. We may use cookies, web beacons, pixel tags or other similar technologies on our Websites or emails to, among other things:
Tailor information presented to you based on your browsing preferences, such as language and geographical region;
Collect statistics regarding your Website usage;
Provide us with information to support technical functionality of service, improve the Website experience and measure marketing effectiveness; and
In some cases, to enable a third party to deliver future advertising for our products and services to you when you visit certain Websites owned by such third parties.
There are several different kinds of cookies, and should we be deploying cookies we (or a third party provider be deploying them in connection with our ecommerce activities) would be using one of the following common types of cookies, which may be persistent cookies or session cookies:
Essential cookies
are necessary to provide you with services and features available through our Websites. Without these cookies, services you may need, such as shopping carts or e-billing, cannot be provided.
Analytics or customization cookies
collect information that is either used in aggregate form to help us understand how the Website is being used or how effective our marketing campaigns are, or to help us customize the Website for you.
Advertising cookies and tracking scripts
are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you. They perform functions like preventing the same ad from continuously reappearing, ensuring that ads are properly delivered and, in some cases, featuring ads based on your interests.
If the Website includes a cookie management tool, you will typically find a hover button at the bottom of your screen. If in the future you do not wish to receive cookies, you may be able to refuse them by adjusting your browser settings to reject cookies. If you do so, we may be unable to offer you some of our functionalities, services or support. If you have previously visited our Websites, you may also have to delete any existing cookies from your browser.
Do-Not-Track.
There are different ways you can prevent tracking of your online activity. One of them is setting a preference in your browser that alerts websites you visit that you do not want them to collect certain information about you. This is referred to as a Do-Not-Track (“DNT”) signal. Please note that our Websites may not recognize or take action in response to DNT signals from web browsers. At this time, there is no universally accepted standard for what a company should do when a DNT signal is detected. In the event a final standard is established, we will assess how to appropriately respond to these signals. For more detailed information about cookies, Do-Not-Track and other tracking technologies, please visit
http://www.youronlinechoices.com
.
Third Party Data Collection.
This may also include cookies placed by third parties, to deliver tailored information and content which may be of interest to you, such as promotions or offerings, when you visit third party websites after you have left our Websites. We do not permit these third parties to collect Personal Information about you (such as email address) on our Website, nor do we share with them any Personal Information about you.
Social Media Features and Widgets
.  Our Websites may include social media features, such as Facebook’s “Like” button, and widgets, such as the “Share This” button. These features are usually recognizable by their third-party brand or logo and may collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our Website, and set a cookie to enable the feature to work properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Website.
Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Currently, we use the features and widgets (“
Plugins
”) of Facebook, Google, Twitter, and LinkedIn offered by the companies Facebook Inc., Google Inc., Twitter Inc. and LinkedIn Corporation (“
Providers
”).
Facebook is operated by Facebook Inc., 1601 S. California Ave, Palo Alto, CA 94304, USA (“
Facebook
”). You will find an overview on Facebook’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://developers.facebook.com/docs/plugins
Google+ is operated by Google Inc., 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA (“
Google
”). You will find an overview on Google’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://developers.google.com/+/web/
Twitter is operated by Twitter Inc., 1355 Market St, Suite 900, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA (“
Twitter
”). You will find an overview on Twitter’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://twitter.com/about/resources/buttons
LinkedIn is operated by LinkedIn Corporation, 1000 West Maude Avenue, Sunnyvale CA 94085, USA (“
LinkedIn
”). You will find an overview on LinkedIn’s Plugin and what they look like here:
https://developer.linkedin.com/plugins
When you access one of our Websites, which contains a Plugin, your browser establishes a direct connection with the servers of Facebook, Google, Twitter, and LinkedIn. The content of the Plugin is transferred by the respective Provider directly to your browser, which then integrates it into the Website. Integration of the Plugin allows the Provider to receive the information that you have accessed the respective Website even if you do not maintain a profile with that Provider or if you are not logged in at the moment. This information (including your IP address) will be transferred by your browser directly to the Provider in the U.S. and stored there. If you are logged in with one of the Providers’ services, they will be able to assign your visit on our Website to your profile with the respective Provider. If you interact with any of the Plugins, e.g. by pressing the ‟Like” or the ‟+1” button, this information will also be sent directly to the server of the Provider and stored there. The information will also be published in the social network on your respective account, e.g. Twitter, and displayed to your contacts there.
For more information on the purpose and extent of the data acquisition and how data are processed and used by the respective Provider as well as regarding your rights and optional settings to protect your privacy, please refer to the privacy policies of the respective Provider:
Privacy Policy of Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
Privacy Policy of Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Privacy Policy of Twitter:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Privacy Policy of LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
If you do not want Google, Facebook, Twitter or LinkedIn to allocate data collected on our Websites to your profile in their service, you must log out of the respective service before visiting our Website. You can prevent the loading of the Plugins completely by using Add-Ons for your browser, e.g. the script-blocker ‟NoScript” (
http://noscript.net/
).
If you accept a session or persistent cookie, you can delete it at any time through your web browser (e.g., as soon as you leave our Ecommerce Engine).  If you do not wish to receive cookies or wish to manage when you accept cookies in general, you may set your browser to reject cookies or to alert you when a cookie is placed on your computer. Although you are not required to accept our cookies, if you set your browser to reject cookies, you may not be able to use all of the features and functionality of this Ecommerce Engine.
We and our partners use third party service providers in connection with this Ecommerce Engine and our business to gather user metrics and usage data. These service providers may collect anonymous information about your visits to our Ecommerce Engine or to a Website, your interaction with our Ecommerce Engine or that Website, and the products and services offered by us, our partners and our suppliers through the use of cookies, pixel tags, JavaScript code or other web technologies. This information may be transferred to servers in the U.S. and stored there. We and our partners may use this anonymous information to provide targeted advertisements to you for goods and services, for marketing analysis, and for quality improvement purposes. Currently, we use the following web tracking services:
Google Analytics
: Google Analytics is a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (“Google”). Google Analytics uses “cookies”, which are text files placed on your computer, to help the Website analyze how users use the site. The information generated by the cookie about your use of the Website will normally be transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States. In case of activation of the IP anonymization, Google will shorten the IP address in EU Member States or other countries of the European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases, the full IP address is sent to a Google server in the US and shortened there. On behalf of the Website provider Google will use this information for the purpose of evaluating your use of the Website, compiling reports on Website activity for Website operators and providing other services relating to Website activity and internet usage to the Website provider. Google will not associate the IP address transmitted by your browser with any other data stored by Google.
You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser. However, please note that if you do so, you may not be able to use the full functionality of this Website. Furthermore, you can prevent the acquisition of data collected by cookies and relating to your use of the Website (including your IP address) by downloading and installing the browser plug-in available under
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. Please note that on this Website, Google Analytics code is supplemented by “anonymizeIp”. This allows to process IP addresses in a shortened form to exclude direct reference to a specific person. For more information provided by Google:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
.
In any case, if you want to manage, deactivate or authorize the cookies, you can use the below links:
Internet Explorer :
https://support.microsoft.com/en-us/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
Chrome :
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/61416?hl=en
Safari :
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT201265
Mozilla :
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website-preferences
Opera :
http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html
4. Sharing Your Personal Information.
We may share your Personal Information in a limited number of circumstances, including with:
Our Partners.
When we make products available for sale through an Ecommerce Engine, we are doing so as an independent ecommerce reSeller of, or service provider for, the partner whose name and/or logo appears as part of the particular Ecommerce Engine. In connection with your purchase of a product or service through an online store we operate that is co-branded with our partner’s branding, we will provide certain of the Personal Information and/or anonymous information you provide in connection with your purchase to that partner for reporting purposes, to allow our partner or its service provider to register your purchase, to enable your access to products or services provided by our partner or its suppliers, to facilitate warranty, technical support or after-sales service, to allow our partner or its subcontractor to send communications to you if you have previously consented to receive them, to allow our partner or its service provider to provide services in connection with this Ecommerce Engine such as customer support or single sign-on functionality on this Ecommerce Engine and our partner’s Website, or for similar purposes in order to fulfill obligations to you. We may also provide certain of the Personal Information you provide in connection with your purchase to the publisher or manufacturer of a product you purchase, or operator of a service for which you purchase a service use right from us, if different than the partner whose name and/or logo appears on this Ecommerce Engine.  The privacy policy of our partner, and of the publisher, manufacturer or operator of the product or service you purchase, will govern how that party uses and protects any of your Personal Information that we provide to them.
Our Service Providers
. We use other companies, which may include but are not limited to present or future corporate affiliates, to provide joint services or certain services to us or on our behalf and help us to operate our business. We may share your information with our service providers in connection with their provision of services to us. We may also allow these companies to use anonymous information, and to use aggregated Personal Information on an anonymous basis (i.e., where the aggregated data cannot identify you personally), for their business purposes.  We will not share your Personal Information with our affiliates or unrelated third parties to use for their own marketing purposes without your consent. We select our partners and service providers on the basis of their security and confidentiality commitments and their compliance with data protection laws.
To Comply With Legal Requirements, Cooperate With Law Enforcement, Prevent Fraud and Other Crimes, and Protect Legal Rights, Ecommerce Engine, You and Others
. To the extent not expressly prohibited by applicable law, we may disclose Personal Information we collect on this Ecommerce Engine without notifying you when we, in good faith, believe disclosure is appropriate: (a)  to comply with the law or a regulatory requirement; (b) to comply with governmental, administrative or judicial process, requirement or order, such as a subpoena or court order; (c) to cooperate with law enforcement or other governmental investigations (without necessarily requiring the law enforcement or government agency requesting the information to formally serve us with a subpoena); (d) to prevent or investigate a possible crime, such as fraud or identity theft; (e) to enforce a contract; to protect the legal rights, property or safety of FastSpring, its corporate affiliates, and their respective employees, clients and partners and agents, other users or the public in general; or (f) to protect your vital interests if determined necessary by us. In addition, we may review our server logs for security purposes, such as detecting intrusions into our network. If we suspect criminal activity, we may share our server logs – which contain visitors’ IP addresses – with the appropriate investigative authorities who may use that information to trace and identify individuals. We also reserve the right to report to appropriate law enforcement or government agencies any activities that we, in good faith, believe are or may be in violation of applicable laws, rules or regulations without providing notice to you. We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). We may be required to disclose Personal Information that we handle under the Privacy Shield in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In Connection With Corporate Events/Transitions
. If one of our corporate affiliates or a third party has acquired our business, specific assets or the business of one of our operating divisions through which you have provided information to us, for example, as the result of a sale, merger, reorganization, insolvency, dissolution or liquidation, your Personal Information may become owned by that company in compliance with applicable data protection laws. In that event, the acquiring company’s use of your Personal Information will still be subject to this Privacy Statement, any applicable Supplemental Privacy Notices, and the privacy preferences you have expressed to us.
We do not sell your Personal Information.
5. Security of Your Personal Information
We are committed to keeping your Personal Information secure. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative safeguards reasonably designed to protect your Personal Information from unauthorized access and disclosure. When we collect or transmit sensitive information such as a financial account number, we use industry standard methods to protect that information. We encrypt Personal Information whenever possible and otherwise restrict access to Personal Information to those employees and individuals with a need to know that information.  It is important that you understand, however, that no Ecommerce Engine, Website, database or system is completely secure or “hacker proof.” You are also responsible for taking reasonable steps to protect your Personal Information against unauthorized disclosure or misuse, for example, by protecting your password. Different countries have different privacy laws and requirements. Please know, however, that no matter where your Personal Information is collected, used, transferred or stored, if it was collected through this Ecommerce Engine, it will be protected by us in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Statement, any Supplemental Privacy Notices that apply to you, and applicable data protection laws.
Cross-Border Transfers of Your Data.
As we operate internationally, and provide you with relevant services through our resources and servers around the globe, sharing your Personal Information across borders is essential. Your Personal Information will be processed on the computer servers (currently Amazon Web Services) in the United States of America on which our Ecommerce Engine is hosted.  In some cases, we may transmit your Personal Information to (i) third party data processors or (ii) product manufacturers, licensors and/or suppliers for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement. To the extent required by applicable data protection laws, we have executed standard contractual clauses to effect the lawful cross-border transfer of personal information.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) Compliance.
FastSpring complies with the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. FastSpring has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF program Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, FastSpring commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your Personal Information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact FastSpring at
privacy@fastspring.com
.
FastSpring has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2
.
As explained here we sometimes provide Personal Information to third parties to perform services on our behalf. If we transfer Personal Information received under the EU-U.S. DPF to a third party, the third party’s access, use, and disclosure of the Personal Information must also be in compliance with our EU-U.S. DPF obligations. Therefore, third parties that use our products explicitly agree to abide by the EU-U.S. DPF or otherwise agree to execute the Standard Contractual Clauses issued by the European Commission for the purposes of transferring Personal Information from the EU to non-adequate countries outside the EU.
Where the EU-U.S. DPF is not applicable, including when there are transfers from the United Kingdom (UK) or Switzerland, FastSpring executes the Standard Contractual Clauses for the purposes of lawful transfer of personal data as set out in European Commission Decision (EU) 2021/914 of 4 June 2021, as well as the UK International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as issued by the UK Information Commissioner under S119A(1) Data Protection Act 2018 (as applicable to any transfers from the UK to non-adequate third countries).
Data Retention Policies
.
We will retain your Personal Information only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your Personal Information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information in accordance with applicable laws.
6. Your Rights & Choices with Respect to Your Personal Information
Your Rights.
Based upon where you reside, certain choices and rights with regards to your Personal Information may be available to you or your authorized agent under applicable data protection laws, such as the GDPR or California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”).
Access Request Rights
You have the right to request that we provide to you the following information about our collection and use of your personal information :
1. The categories of Personal Information we have collected about you.
2. The categories of sources for the Personal Information we have collected about you (e.g., use of cookies, third party, etc.).
3. Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that Personal Information.
4. The categories of third parties with whom we share or have shared that Personal Information.
5. The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you (also called a data portability request), and
6. Information regarding any disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the Personal Information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion, Rectification and Restriction Request Rights
You have the right to request that we delete, restrict or, if you believe that our processing of your Personal Information is incorrect or inaccurate, change any of the Personal Information collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions.  Once your verifiable consumer request is confirmed, we will delete, restrict or change, as the case may be, and direct our service providers to delete, restrict or change your Personal Information.  Your request to delete the Personal Information collected may be denied if it is necessary for us to retain your information under one or more of the exceptions listed in the GDPR or CCPA.
Data Portability Rights
In some cases, you may receive your Personal Information provided by yourself in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format.
Right to Object
Where we process your Personal Information based on a "legitimate interest", you may have the legal right to object to the processing of your Personal Information.
Right to Revoke Consent
Where we process Personal Information based on your consent, you have the right to revoke such consent at any given time.
Post-mortem Right to Privacy
If you are located in EEA, you have the right to set instructions regarding the storage, deletion or communication of your Personal Information after your death.
Right to Complain
You have the legal right to lodge a complaint with the competent authority.
If you contact us we may, for your protection, ask you for additional information to verify your identity. In most cases, we will provide the access you request, correct or delete any inaccurate Personal Information you discover, cease the processing of your Personal Information and implement your guidelines. We reserve the right, however, to limit or deny your request to the extent permitted by applicable law if the disclosure may lead to a breach of applicable law and regulation, e.g. in case of any legal obligation to retain certain data, or if you have failed to provide sufficient evidence to verify your identity.
Your Choices.
FastSpring respects your right to make choices about the ways we collect, use and disclose information about you. We generally ask you to indicate your choices at the time, and on the page, where you provide your Personal Information. When you provide Personal Information, we may offer you a choice as to whether you would like to receive further communications from us and/or from our partners via a box to tick for example, such as communications related to updates, upgrades, special offers and pricing. You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you decide you no longer want to receive promotional messages from us, you may let us know by e-mailing us at
remove@fastspring.com
or by following any unsubscribe link in our e-mails; please specify which consent you are revoking in your e-mail to us. Please note, however, if you give us permission to add your contact information to our partner’s mailing list and later withdraw your permission, you will have to contact our partner (or use the “opt-out” provided in the e-mails our partner sends you) to have your name removed from our partner’s mailing lists.
7. Links to Third Party Websites
FastSpring’s Website provides links to third-party web sites, which are not under the control of FastSpring. FastSpring makes no representations about third-party web sites. When you access a non-FastSpring website, you do so at your own risk. FastSpring is not responsible for the reliability of any data, opinions, advice, or statements made on third-party sites. FastSpring provides these links merely as a convenience. The inclusion of such links does not imply that FastSpring endorses, recommends, or accepts any responsibility for the content of such sites.
8. Children’s Privacy
This Ecommerce Engine and our services are not directed at nor targeted to children under the age of 13. If you have not reached the age of majority or are not able to enter into legally binding agreements in your country, you may not use this Ecommerce Engine unless supervised by an adult.  Our goal is to comply with applicable laws and regulations relating to collection and use of information from children as such term is defined by applicable laws. If you believe that we have received information from a child or other person protected under such laws, please notify us immediately by postal mail addressed to FastSpring’s Privacy Department, 801 Garden Street #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America or by e-mail at
privacy@fastspring.com
, and we will take reasonable steps to remove that information from our databases.
9. Changes to This Privacy Statement
We may occasionally update this Privacy Statement.  These updates may reflect, among other things, changes in applicable laws, rules or regulations, changes in our data collection practices, and/or changes to our business or services.  If revisions to the Privacy Statement materially affect how we may use Personal Information collected from you prior to the date of the revised statement, then we will request that you opt-in to the revised Privacy Statement via a checkbox for each new order/purchase. We will post an updated version of this Privacy Statement on the Ecommerce Engine with a revised effective date, to let you know that we updated the Privacy Statement.
10. How to Contact Us.
If you have any questions, comments, or concerns regarding this Privacy Statement or our privacy practices, have privacy-related questions not answered online, or if you would like to exercise any of your rights outlined in this Privacy Statement you may contact us by any of the following means:
Online Requests:
You may contact us via our online form located
here
.
By Mail:
You may contact us by postal mail addressed to Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring, ATTN: Privacy Department, 801 Garden Street, #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America.
By Email:
You may contact us by e-mail at
privacy@fastspring.com
.  Please specify “Global Privacy Question” in the subject line to help us to expedite our review of your e-mail.
You may write to us in your own language.
Have any questions about FastSpring? We’re here to help!
I'd like to talk to sales.
I need to contact support.
I have a question about a charge.
Hi there! 👋 Have any questions about FastSpring? We’re here to help!
1
Loading video...
Cookie Policy
This website uses cookies to enhance user experience and to analyze performance and traffic on our website. You may click "Allow & Continue", or modify your cookie preferences by clicking "Settings" below. Please read our policies regarding
Privacy
and
Cookies
GDPR
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Media Partners
Performance & Analytics
Settings
Save Choices
Allow & Continue
Our Use of Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Media Partners
Performance & Analytics
Our Use of Cookies
When you visit our website, we store cookies on your browser to collect information. The information collected might relate to you, your preferences or your device, and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to and to provide a more personalized web experience. However, you can choose not to allow certain types of cookies, which may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings according to your preference. You cannot opt-out of our Strictly Necessary Cookies as they are deployed in order to ensure the proper functioning of our website (such as prompting the cookie banner and remembering your settings, to log into your account, to redirect you when you log out, secure our website from bots, ensure balanced server loads, etc.). For more information about the First and Third Party Cookies used please refer to our
Privacy
and
Cookies
policies.
Always Active
Strictly necessary cookies are required for our website to function properly and to provide users with a functional and elegant experience. As a result, you may not opt-out of this category of cookie. Information about how to block all cookies from loading in your browser can be found here:
https://www.cookiesandyou.com/disable-cookies/
, however this is not recommended as it will break many web experiences.
For a full list of the Strictly Necessary cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
.
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies support the features and user interface that you, the user, experience while browsing our website. For example, these cookies may be used when displaying our online chat feature, or anonymously analyzing site usage with metrics such as what pages get the most visits or which navigation links are clicked on most frequently. Depending on your geographic region you may be able to opt out of Functional Cookies, but some elements of our website may not function properly.
For a full list of the Functional cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
.
Media Partners
These cookies are used to track the performance of FastSpring’s advertising efforts, and to improve the accuracy of ads that we place on external websites. For example, if you visit fastspring.com and then leave, a cookie may be used to show you an ad promoting FastSpring’s services on external websites. You may opt-out of these cookies by disabling the Media Partner cookie category with the toggle switch in the Cookie Preference center.
For a full list of the Media Partner cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
Performance & Analytics
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 3
https://paddle.com/privacy/:
Live masterclass
Web Revenue Labs: Take your Web2App performance to the next level
Save your seat
Policy
Privacy policy
A. This Policy
Summary
: This Policy explains how we Process Personal Data. This Policy may be amended or updated from time to time, so please check it regularly for updates.
This Policy is issued by Paddle which is made up of each of the Controller entities that are listed in Section (U) below (together, “Paddle”, “we”, “us” and “our”) and is addressed to individuals outside our organisation with whom we interact in our course of business as a Merchant of Record, including customers, visitors to our Sites, other users of our products or services, personnel of corporate customers and vendors, applicants for employment, and visitors to our premises (together, “you”). Please note that not all provisions of this Policy will apply to you and your Personal Data, as this will depend on your specific relationship with Paddle.
Defined terms used in this Policy are explained in Section (V) below.
This Policy may be amended or updated from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the Processing of Personal Data, or changes in applicable law. We encourage you to read this Policy carefully, and to regularly check this page to review any changes we might make in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
This Policy was last updated on
30 June 2023.
You may also have certain rights regarding the information we collect about you. Specifically, the rights of Data Subjects of the EEA are explained in Section (M) below. Similarly, Residents of certain US states, including California and Virginia, may find information on their rights as a Consumer in Sections (R), (S) and (T)  below.
B. Collection of Personal Data
Summary
: We collect or obtain Personal Data: when that data is provided to us (e.g., where you contact us); in the course of our relationship with you (e.g., if you appoint us as your Merchant of Record or if you make a purchase from Paddle); when you make Personal Data public (e.g., if you make a public post about us on social media); when you visit our Sites; when you register to use any of our Sites, products, or services; or when you interact with any third party content or advertising on a Site; we may also receive Personal Data about you from third parties (e.g., law enforcement authorities).
We collect or obtain Personal Data about you from the following sources:
Data provided to us: We obtain Personal Data when such data is provided to us (e.g., where you contact us via email or via our Sites, or by any other means, or when you provide us with your business card, or when you submit a job application).
Data we obtain in person: We obtain Personal Data during meetings, at trade shows, during visits from sales or marketing representatives, in person interviews or at events we attend.
Collaborations: We obtain Personal Data when you collaborate with us in research or in an advisory/consultancy capacity.
Relationship data: We collect or obtain Personal Data in the ordinary course of our relationship with you (e.g. we provide a service to you, or to your employer).
Data you make public: We collect or obtain Personal Data that you manifestly choose to make public, including via social media (e.g. we may collect information from your social media profile(s) or if you make a public post about us).
Site data: We may collect or obtain Personal Data when you visit any of our Sites or use any features or resources available on or through a Site.
Registration details: We collect or obtain Personal Data when you use, or register to use, any of our Sites, products, or services.
Content and advertising information: If you interact with any third party content or advertising on a Site (including third party plugins and cookies) we may receive Personal Data from the relevant third party provider of that content or advertising.
Third party information: We collect or obtain Personal Data from third parties who provide it to us (e.g. credit reference agencies; law enforcement authorities; etc.).
C. Creation of Personal Data
Summary:
We create Personal Data about you (e.g., records of your interactions with us).
We also create Personal Data about you in certain circumstances, such as records of your interactions with us, and details of your past interactions with us. We may also combine Personal Data from any of our Sites, products, or services, including where that data is collected from different sources.
D. Categories of Personal Data we Process
Summary
: We Process: your personal details (e.g., your name); demographic data (e.g. your age); your contact details (e.g., your address); records of your consents; purchase details; payment details (e.g. billing address); information about your interaction with our Sites (e.g. the type of device you are using); details of your employer (where relevant); information about your interactions with our content or advertising; and any views or opinions you provide to us.
We Process the following categories of Personal Data about you:
Personal details: given name(s); preferred name.
Demographic information: gender; date of birth / age; nationality; salutation; title; and language preferences.
Contact details: correspondence address; telephone number; email address; details of Personal Assistants, where applicable; messenger app details; online messaging details; and social media details.
Expertise: records of your expertise; professional history; practising details and qualification details; information about your experience; participation in meetings; seminars; advisory boards and conferences; information about your professional relationship with other individuals or institutions; language abilities and other professional skills.
Consent records: records of any consents you have given, together with the date and time; means of consent and any related information (e.g. the subject matter of the consent).
Purchase details: records of purchases and prices; and consignee name, address, contact telephone number and email address;
Payment details: invoice records; payment records; billing address; payment method; cardholder or account holder name; card payment identifiers; payment amount; and payment date.
Data relating to your use of our Sites: device type; operating system; browser type; browser settings; IP address; language settings; dates and times of connecting to a Site; username; password; security login details; and usage data.
Employer details: where you interact with us in your capacity as an employee of a third party, the name, address, telephone number and email address of your employer, to the extent relevant.
Content and advertising data: records of your interactions with our online advertising and content, records of advertising and content displayed on pages displayed to you, and any interaction you may have had with such content or advertising (e.g., mouse hover, mouse clicks, any forms you complete in whole or in part) and any touchscreen interactions.
Views and opinions: any views and opinions that you choose to send to us, or publicly post about us on social media platforms.
Please note that not all of the above will apply to you, as it will depend on your relationship with Paddle (e.g. Employee, customer, etc).
E. Sensitive Personal Data
Summary
: We do not seek to collect or otherwise Process Sensitive Personal Data in the ordinary course of our business as a Merchant of Record. Where we need to Process Sensitive Personal Data for a legitimate purpose, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
Where it becomes necessary to Process your Sensitive Personal Data for any reason, we rely on one of the following legal bases:
Compliance with applicable law: We may Process your Sensitive Personal Data where the Processing is required or permitted by applicable law (e.g., to comply with our diversity reporting obligations);
Detection and prevention of crime: We may Process your Sensitive Personal Data where the Processing is necessary for the detection or prevention of crime (e.g., the prevention of fraud);
Establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims: We may Process your Sensitive Personal Data where the Processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; or
Consent: We may Process your Sensitive Personal Data where we have, in accordance with applicable law, obtained your express consent prior to Processing your Sensitive Personal Data (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
If you provide Sensitive Personal Data to us, you must ensure that it is lawful for you to disclose such data to us, and you must ensure a valid legal basis applies to the Processing of those Sensitive Personal Data.
F. Purposes of Processing and Legal Bases for Processing
Summary
: We Process Personal Data for the following purposes: providing our Sites, products, and services to you; compliance checks; operating our business; communicating with you; managing our IT systems; health and safety; financial management; conducting surveys; ensuring the security of our premises and systems; conducting investigations where necessary; compliance with applicable law; improving our Sites, products, and services; fraud prevention; establishment, exercise and defence of legal claims; and recruitment and job applications.
The purposes for which we Process Personal Data, subject to applicable law, and the legal bases on which we perform such Processing, are as follows:
Provision of Sites, products, and services:
providing our Sites, products, or services; providing promotional items upon request; and communicating with you in relation to those Sites, products, or services.
The Processing is necessary in connection with any contract that you have entered into with us, or to take steps prior to entering into a contract with us; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of providing our Sites, products, or services (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way)
Compliance checks:
fulfilling our regulatory compliance obligations; ‘Know Your Client’ checks; and confirming and verifying your identity; use of credit reference agencies; and screening against government and/or law enforcement agency sanctions lists and other legal restrictions.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation; or
The Processing is necessary in connection with any contract that you have entered into with us, or to take steps prior to entering into a contract with us; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of fulfilling our regulatory and compliance obligations (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Operating our business:
operating and managing our Sites, our products, and our services; providing content to you; displaying advertising and other information to you; communicating and interacting with you via our Sites, our products, or our services; and notifying you of changes to any of our Sites, our products, or our services.
The Processing is necessary in connection with any contract that you have entered into with us, or to take steps prior to entering into a contract with us; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of providing our Sites, our products, or our services to you (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Communications and marketing:
communicating with you via any means (including via email, telephone, text message, social media, post or in person) to provide news items and other information in which you may be interested, subject always to obtaining your prior opt-in consent to the extent required under applicable law; personalising our Sites, products and services for you; maintaining and updating your contact information where appropriate; obtaining your prior, opt-in consent where required; enabling and recording your choice to opt-out or unsubscribe, where applicable.
The Processing is necessary in connection with any contract that you have entered into with us, or to take steps prior to entering into a contract with us; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of contacting you, subject always to compliance with applicable law (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Management of IT systems:
management and operation of our communications, IT and security systems; and audits (including security audits) and monitoring of such systems.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of managing and maintaining our communications and IT systems (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms).
Health and safety:
health and safety assessments and record keeping; providing a safe and secure environment at our premises; and compliance with related legal obligations.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of ensuring a safe environment at our premises (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
The Processing is necessary to protect the vital interests of any individual.
Financial management
: sales; finance; corporate audit; and vendor management.
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of managing and operating the financial affairs of our business (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Surveys:
engaging with you for the purposes of obtaining your views on our Sites, our products, or our services.
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of conducting surveys, satisfaction reports and market research (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Security:
physical security of our premises (including records of visits to our premises); CCTV recordings; and electronic security (including login records and access details).
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation ; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of ensuring the physical and electronic security of our business and our premises (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms).
Investigations:
detecting, investigating and preventing breaches of policy, and criminal offences, in accordance with applicable law.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation ; or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of detecting, and protecting against, breaches of our policies and applicable laws (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms).
Legal compliance:
compliance with our legal and regulatory obligations under applicable law.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation.
Improving our Sites, products, and services:
identifying issues with our Sites, our products, or our services; planning improvements to our Sites, our products, or our services; and creating new Sites, products, or services.
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of improving our Sites, our products, or our services (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
Fraud prevention:
Detecting, preventing and investigating fraud.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation (especially in respect of applicable employment law); or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of detecting, and protecting against, fraud (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms).
Establishment, exercise and defence of legal claims:
management of legal claims; establishment of facts and claims, including collection, review and production of documents, facts, evidence and witness statements; exercise and defence of legal rights and claims, including formal legal proceedings.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation;
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of establishing, exercising or defending our legal rights (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
The Processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
Recruitment and job applications:
recruitment activities; advertising of positions; interview activities; analysis of suitability for the relevant position; records of hiring decisions; offer details; and acceptance details.
The Processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation (especially in respect of applicable employment law); or
We have a legitimate interest in carrying out the Processing for the purpose of recruitment activities and handling job applications (to the extent that such legitimate interest is not overridden by your interests, fundamental rights, or freedoms); or
We have obtained your prior consent to the Processing (this legal basis is only used in relation to Processing that is entirely voluntary – it is not used for Processing that is necessary or obligatory in any way).
G. Disclosure of Personal Data to Third Parties
Summary
: We disclose Personal Data to: legal and regulatory authorities; our external advisors; our Processors; any party as necessary in connection with legal proceedings; any party as necessary for investigating, detecting or preventing criminal offences; any purchaser of our business or successor in title to our obligations under a contract; and any third party providers of advertising, plugins or content used on our Sites.
We disclose Personal Data to other entities within the Paddle group, for legitimate business purposes and the operation of our Sites, products, or services to you, in accordance with applicable law. In addition, we disclose Personal Data to:
you and, where appropriate, your appointed representatives;
legal and regulatory authorities, upon request, or for the purposes of reporting any actual or suspected breach of applicable law or regulation;
accountants, auditors, consultants, lawyers and other outside professional advisors to Paddle, subject to binding contractual obligations of confidentiality;
third party Processors (such as payment services providers etc.), located anywhere in the world, subject to the requirements noted below in this Section (G);
any relevant party, regulatory body, governmental authority, law enforcement agency or court, to the extent necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims and with applicable jurisdiction;
any relevant party, regulatory body, governmental authority, law enforcement agency or court, for the purposes of prevention, investigation, detection or prosecution of criminal offences or the execution of criminal penalties;
any alternative payment provider or reseller appointed by the Supplier or other third party acquirer(s) or successor(s) in title, including but not limited to in the event that we sell or transfer all or any relevant portion of our business or assets (including in
the event of a reorganisation, dissolution or liquidation); and
any relevant third party provider, where our Sites use third party advertising, plugins or content. If you choose to interact with any such advertising, plugins or content, your Personal Data may be shared with the relevant third party provider. We recommend that you review that third party’s privacy policy before interacting with its advertising, plugins or content.
Suppliers to the extent necessary to provide a product requested by you.
any other relevant third party outsourced service providers, where our Sites use third parties to perform certain functions otherwise performed by Paddle, subject to binding contractual obligations of confidentiality.
If we engage a third-party Processor to Process your Personal Data, the Processor will be subject to binding contractual obligations to: (i) only Process the Personal Data in accordance with our prior written instructions; and (ii) use measures to protect the confidentiality and security of the Personal Data; together with any additional requirements under applicable law, including the provisions at Section (H) below, with respect to international transfers.
H. International Transfer of Personal Data
Summary:
We transfer Personal Data to recipients in other countries. Where we transfer Personal Data from the UK/EEA to a recipient outside the UK/EEA that is not in an Adequate Jurisdiction, we do so on the basis of Standard Contractual Clauses and in the presence of appropriate safeguards.
Because of the international nature of our business, we transfer Personal Data within the Paddle group, and to third parties as noted in Section (G) above, in connection with the purposes set out in this Policy. For this reason, we may transfer Personal Data to other countries that may have different laws and data protection compliance requirements to those that apply in the country in which you are located.
If an exemption or derogation applies (e.g., where a transfer is necessary to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim) we may rely on that exemption or derogation, as appropriate. Where no exemption or derogation applies, and we transfer your Personal Data from the UK/EEA to recipients located outside the UK/EEA who are not in an Adequate Jurisdiction, we do so on the basis of Standard Contractual Clauses and the presence of appropriate safeguards. Please contact the privacy team at
privacy@paddle.com
below if you wish to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
Please note that when you transfer any Personal Data directly to any Paddle entity established outside the UK/EEA, we are not responsible for that transfer of your Personal Data. We will nevertheless Process your Personal Data, from the point at which we receive those data, in accordance with the provisions of this Policy.
I. Data Security
Summary
: We have implemented appropriate technical and organisational security measures to protect your Personal Data against unauthorised or unlawful Processing, and against accidental loss, destruction or damage.
Insofar as you are able, please ensure that any Personal Data that you send to us is sent securely.
We have implemented appropriate technical and organisational security measures designed to protect your Personal Data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorised disclosure, unauthorised access, and other unlawful or unauthorised forms of Processing, from the point of collection to the point of destruction, in accordance with applicable law.
Because the internet is an open system, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will implement all reasonable measures to protect your Personal Data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to us using the internet – any such transmission is at your own risk and you are responsible for ensuring that any Personal Data that you send to us are sent securely.
J. Data Accuracy
Summary
: We take reasonable steps to ensure that your Personal Data is kept accurate and up-to-date and is erased or rectified if we become aware of inaccuracies.
We take reasonable steps to ensure that:
your Personal Data that we Process is accurate and, where necessary, kept up-to-date; and
any of your Personal Data that we Process that is inaccurate (having regard to the purposes for which it was Processed) is erased or rectified without delay;
From time to time we may ask you to confirm the accuracy of your Personal Data.
K. Data Minimisation
Summary
: We take reasonable steps to limit the volume of your Personal Data that we Process to what is necessary.
We take reasonable steps to ensure that your Personal Data that we Process is limited to the Personal Data reasonably necessary in connection with the purposes set out in this Policy.
L. Data Retention
Summary
: We take reasonable steps to ensure that your Personal Data is only retained for as long as it is needed in connection with its lawful purpose.
We take reasonable steps to ensure that your Personal Data is only Processed for the minimum period necessary for the purposes set out in this Policy. The criteria for determining the duration for which we will retain your Personal Data is as follows:
1. We will retain Personal Data in a form that permits identification as long as:
we maintain an ongoing relationship with you (e.g., where you are lawfully included in our mailing list and have not unsubscribed); or
your Personal Data is necessary in connection with the lawful purposes set out in this Policy, for which we have a valid legal basis (e.g., where your Personal Data is included in a contract between us and your employer, and we have a legitimate interest in Processing that Personal Data for the purposes of operating our business and fulfilling our obligations under that contract; or where we have a legal obligation to retain your Personal Data)
Plus:
2. The duration of:
any applicable limitation period under applicable law (i.e., any period during which any person could bring a legal claim against us in connection with your Personal Data, or to which your Personal Data is relevant); and
an additional two (2) month period following the end of such applicable limitation period (so that, if a person brings a claim at the end of the limitation period, we are still afforded a reasonable amount of time in which to identify any Personal Data that is relevant to that claim),
And:
3. In addition, if any relevant legal claims are brought, we continue to Process Personal Data for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
During the periods noted above, we will restrict our Processing of your Personal Data to storage of, and maintaining the security of, those data, except to the extent that those data need to be reviewed in connection with any legal claim, or any obligation under applicable law.
Once the periods noted above, each to the extent applicable, have concluded, we will either:
permanently delete or destroy the relevant Personal Data; or
anonymise the relevant Personal Data.
M. Your Legal Rights
Summary
: Subject to applicable law, you may have a number of rights, including: the right not to provide your Personal Data to us; the right of access to your Personal Data; the right to request rectification of inaccuracies; the right to request the erasure, or restriction of Processing, of your Personal Data; the right to object to the Processing of your Personal Data; the right to have your Personal Data transferred to another Controller; the right to withdraw consent; and the right to lodge complaints with Data Protection Authorities. In some cases it will be necessary to provide evidence of your identity before we can give effect to these rights.
Subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Processing of your Relevant Personal Data:
the right not to provide your Personal Data to us (however, please note that we will be unable to provide you with the full benefit of our Sites, products, or services, if you do not provide us with your Personal Data – e.g., we might not be able to process your requests without the necessary details);
the right to request access to, or copies of, your Relevant Personal Data, together with information regarding the nature, Processing and disclosure of that Relevant Personal Data;
the right to request rectification (or correction) of any inaccuracies in your Relevant Personal Data;
the right to request, on legitimate grounds: erasure of your Relevant Personal Data or restriction of Processing of your Relevant Personal Data
the right to have certain Relevant Personal Data transferred to another Controller, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, to the extent applicable;
where we Process your Relevant Personal Data on the basis of your consent, the right to withdraw that consent (noting that such withdrawal does not affect the lawfulness of any Processing performed prior to the date on which we receive notice of such withdrawal, and does not prevent the Processing of your Personal Data in reliance upon any other available legal bases); and
the right to lodge complaints regarding the Processing of your Relevant Personal Data with a Data Protection Authority (in particular, the Data Protection Authority of the EU Member State in which you live, or in which you work, or in which the alleged infringement occurred, each if applicable).
Subject to applicable law, you may also have the following additional rights regarding the Processing of your Relevant Personal Data:
the right to object, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the Processing of your Relevant Personal Data by us or on our behalf, where such processing is based on Articles 6(1)(e) (public interest) or 6(1)(f) (legitimate interests) of the GDPR;
the right to object to the Processing of your Relevant Personal Data by us or on our behalf for direct marketing purposes; and
opt you out of the automated processing of your Personal Data in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, if applicable.
This does not affect your statutory rights.
To exercise one or more of these rights, or to ask a question about these rights or any other provision of this Policy, or about our Processing of your Personal Data, you may submit your request via
https://preferences.paddle.com/privacy
or email
privacy@paddle.com
Please note that:
in some cases it will be necessary to provide evidence of your identity before we can give effect to these rights;
where your request requires the establishment of additional facts (e.g., a determination of whether any Processing is non-compliant with applicable law) we will investigate your request reasonably promptly, before deciding what action to take; and
certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
Depending on applicable law, you may have the right to appeal our decision to deny your request. You can contact us as set forth above to appeal such decision.
N. Cookies and Similar Technologies
Summary
: We Process Personal Data by using Cookies and similar technologies. For more information, please see our Cookie Policy.
When you visit a Site we will typically place Cookies onto your device, or read Cookies already on your device, subject always  to obtaining your consent, where required, in accordance with applicable law. We use Cookies to record information about your device, your browser and, in some cases, your preferences and browsing habits. We Process Personal Data through Cookies and similar technologies, in accordance with our
Cookie Policy
.
O. Terms of Use
Summary
: All Suppliers are subject to Terms of Use that govern all use of our Site.
All use of our Merchant of Record services is subject to each Supplier’s Terms of Use. We recommend that you review your applicable Terms of Use to ensure that you are aware of your obligations and where applicable, regularly in order to review any changes we might make from time to time as this may influence your rights under this Policy.
P. Terms of Sale
Summary
: Our Buyer Terms and Conditions govern the sale of all Products by Paddle.
All sales of Products are subject to our
Buyer Terms and Conditions
. We recommend that you review these regularly, in order to review any changes we might make from time to time as this may influence your rights under this Policy.
Q. Direct Marketing
Summary
: We Process Personal Data to contact you with information regarding Sites, products, or services that may be of interest to you. You may unsubscribe for free at any time.
We Process Personal Data to contact you via email, telephone, direct mail or other communication formats to provide you with information regarding Sites, products, or services that may be of interest to you. We also Process Personal Data for the purposes of displaying content tailored to your use of our Sites, products, or services. If we provide Sites, products, or services to you, we may send or display information to you regarding our Sites, products, or services, upcoming promotions and other information that may be of interest to you, including by using the contact details that you have provided to us, or any other appropriate means, subject always to obtaining your prior opt-in consent to the extent required under applicable law.
You may change your preferences, or unsubscribe from our promotional email list at any time by simply clicking on the unsubscribe link included in every promotional electronic communication and updating your communication preferences. Please note that it may take up to a month to process your unsubscribe request during which time you may continue to receive communications from us. After you unsubscribe, we will not send you further promotional emails, but in some circumstances we will continue to contact you to the extent necessary for the purposes of any Sites, products, or services you have requested (for example, we may send you emails about your Paddle projects or our ongoing business relationship). R. California Consumer Privacy Act Disclosures
R. California Disclosures
Summary
: Under the California Consumer Privacy Act as amended (“CCPA”), we must disclose our practices regarding the collection, use, and disclosure of the Personal Information of California Residents (“Consumers”). Consumers are also afforded additional rights with regard to the Personal Information that we collect about them that include the rights of access, deletion, and to be free from discrimination. This section of our Privacy Policy includes the disclosures required by the CCPA.
Collection of Personal Information:
We have collected and will collect the following general categories of Personal Information about Consumers, relative to your relationship with Paddle:
Personal identifiers, such as names, aliases, postal addresses, unique personal identifiers, online identifiers, internet protocol addresses, email addresses, account names, social security numbers, driver’s license numbers, and passport numbers,
Categories of Personal Information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e) including names, addresses, telephone numbers, credit and debit card identifiers;
Protected classifications, including sex, age, and national origin;
Commercial information, including products or Services you have purchased, and your purchasing history;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Geolocation data;
Audio, visual or similar information;
Professional or employment related information;
Education information; and
Inferences drawn from your personal information for use in creating a consumer profile (e.g. behaviour).
Please note that not all of the above will apply to you, as it will depend on your relationship with Paddle (e.g. Employee, customer, etc).
Use of Personal Information
We may use the categories of Personal Information described above for the following business or commercial purposes:
Advancing our commercial or economic business interests through our services and products to our Suppliers and customers;
Maintaining and servicing Supplier accounts;
Auditing Supplier activity on our Sites;
Processing or fulfilling orders and transactions;
Processing, managing, and accounting for transactions;
Providing customer support and support to Suppliers;
Verifying customer and Supplier information;
For short term, transient uses (such as contextual advertising);
To understand and enhance your experience on our Sites or with our services by utilising analytic services;
Advertising our services;
Linking or combining it with information received from third parties to help understand your needs and provide you with an enhanced service;
Performing internal research for technological development;
Ensuring and improving the quality and safety of our services and products;
Debugging to address impairments to operational functionality;
Detecting security incidents;
Complying with applicable law and law enforcement requirements;
Protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity and assisting in the prosecution of those responsible for such activities; and
Defending against or bringing legal action, claims and other liabilities.
Categories of Sources of Personal Information
We collect or obtain Personal Information about you from the following sources:
You: We obtain Personal Information when you provide it to us (e.g., where you create an account, purchase products, participate in research, where you contact us via email or telephone, provide us information during meetings, at trade shows, during visits from sales or marketing representatives, or at events we attend, or by any other means, or when you submit a job application), and when you visit any of our Sites or use any features or resources available on or through a Site.
Collaborations: We obtain Personal Information when you collaborate with us in research or in an advisory/consultancy capacity.
Public sources: We collect or obtain Personal Information that you manifestly choose to make public, including via social media (e.g., we may collect information from your social media profile(s), if you make a public post about us).
Registration details: We collect or obtain Personal Information when you use, or register to use, any of our Sites or services.
Third Party content and advertising partners: If you interact with any third party content or advertising on a Site (including third party plugins and cookies) we receive Personal Information from the relevant third party provider of that content or advertising.
Other third party sources: We collect or obtain Personal Information from third parties who provide it to us (e.g., credit reference agencies; law enforcement authorities; etc.).
Disclosures of Personal Information
We do not Sell any Personal Information to third parties. In particular, we do not Sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age.
In the preceding 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of personal information to the following categories of recipients.
The following is the categories of recipients to which we disclose information and the categories of Personal Information disclosed:
To:
Legal and regulatory authorities, upon request, or for the purposes of reporting any actual or suspected breach of applicable law or regulation;
Personal Identifiers;
Categories of personal information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)
Commercial Information
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Geolocation data;
Inferences for use in creating a consumer profile
Accountants, auditors, consultants, lawyers and other outside professional advisors to Paddle, subject to binding contractual obligations of confidentiality;
Personal identifiers;
Categories of Personal Information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e);
Protected classifications (if provided);
Commercial information;
Geolocation data;
Professional or employment related information;
Inferences drawn from your personal information for use in creating a consumer profile.
Third-party Processors (such as payment services providers etc.), located anywhere in the world, subject to the requirements noted in Section (G);
Personal identifiers;
Categories of Personal Information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e);
Commercial information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Geolocation data;
Professional or employment related information;
Education information;
Inferences drawn from your personal information for use in creating a consumer profile.
Any relevant party, regulatory body, governmental authority, law enforcement agency or court, to the extent necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims;
Personal identifiers;
Categories of Personal Information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)
Protected classifications;
Commercial information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Geolocation data;
Professional or employment related information;
Inferences drawn from your personal information for use in creating a consumer profile.
Any relevant party, regulatory body, governmental authority, law enforcement agency or court, for the purposes of prevention, investigation, detection or prosecution of criminal offences or the execution of criminal penalties;
Personal identifiers;
Categories of Personal Information enumerated in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e);
Commercial information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Geolocation data;
Any relevant third party provider, where our Sites use third party advertising, plugins or content;
Personal identifiers;
Commercial information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Inferences drawn from your personal information for use in creating a consumer profile.
Retention
We determine the duration for which we will retain your Personal Data is as follows:
The status of our ongoing relationship with you (e.g. where you are lawfully included in our mailing list and have not unsubscribed); or
If your Personal Data is necessary in connection with the lawful purposes set out in this Policy, for which we have a valid legal basis (e.g. where your Personal Data is included in a contract between us and your employer, and we have a legitimate interest in Processing that Personal Data for the purposes of operating our business and fulfilling our obligations under that contract; or where we have a legal obligation to retain your Personal Data).
Plus, the duration of:
any applicable limitation period under applicable law (i.e. any period during which any person could bring a legal claim against us in connection with your Personal Data, or to which your Personal Data is relevant); and
an additional two (2) month period following the end of such applicable limitation period (so that, if a person brings a claim at the end of the limitation period, we are still afforded a reasonable amount of time in which to identify any Personal Data that is relevant to that claim).
And:
In addition, if any relevant legal claim are brought, we continue to Process Personal Data for such additional periods as are necessary in connection with that claim.
S. Consumer Rights Under the CCPA
Summary
: Subject to the CCPA, you may have a number of rights, including: the right to know about your Personal Information, right to request the deletion of your Personal Information, the right to opt out of a Sale or Sharing of your Personal Information, the right to correct inaccurate records of your Personal Information, the right to limit the use and disclosure of any Sensitive Personal Information and the right to non-discrimination when you exercise your rights under the CCPA
You may make a request to exercise a right as set forth above. Generally, in order to verify your request, we will compare the Personal Information we already hold about you to the Personal Information we will request in the course of processing your request. The Personal Information required for verification may include your name and email address, or further information if we reasonably believe it is necessary to verify you. To exercise your rights under the CCPA, please follow the instructions described in this section.
Right to Know About Personal Information.
Consumers have the right to request that we disclose the following information, in a readily useable format, covering the 12 month period preceding the request:
The categories of Personal Information we collected about you.
The purposes for which the categories of Personal Information collected about you will be used.
The categories of sources for the Personal Information we collected about you.
The categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting Personal Information.
The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you.
The categories of Personal Information we have disclosed for a business purpose.
Right to Request Deletion of Personal Information
. Consumers have the right to request that we delete any Personal Information that we have collected from them. Your request may be subject to certain exemptions under applicable laws.
We may keep a record of deletion requests solely as a record of compliance.
Right to correct inaccurate records of your Personal Information.
Consumers have the right to request that we use commercially reasonable efforts to correct any inaccurate Personal Information.
Right to opt out of a Sale or the Sharing of your Personal Information.
Please note that Paddle does not Sell or Share your information within the meaning of the California Privacy Acts.
Right to limit the use and disclosure of any Sensitive Personal Information.
Consumers have the right to direct a business to limit its use and disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information. Please note that Paddle will only collect and use Sensitive Personal Information where it is absolutely required to do so in the course of its relationship with you and all information collected is subjected to record retention timeframes based on law and industry standards.
Requests to know, correct, or delete data may be submitted via
preferences.paddle.com/privacy
Right to Non-Discrimination.
Consumers have the right to be free from discrimination as set forth in the CCPA when they exercise their Consumer rights under the CCPA.
Notice of Financial Incentive.
We do not offer financial incentives or a price or service difference to incentivise consumers to provide personal information.
Authorised Agent
. Under the CCPA, you may appoint an authorised agent to submit requests to exercise your rights on your behalf. Should you choose to do so, for your and our protection, we will require your authorised agent to provide us with a signed permission demonstrating that they are authorised to submit a request on your behalf. Should your authorised agent fail to submit proof that they have been authorised to act on your behalf, we will deny their request.
T. California's "Shine the Light" Law
Summary
:  California residents are entitled to request a notice describing what  categories of personal customer information We share with third parties.
Under California’s “Shine the Light” law, California residents are entitled to ask us for a notice describing what categories of personal customer information we share with third parties for the purposes of their direct marketing.
U. Details of Controllers
Summary
: There are several Paddle entities that act as Controllers for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
For the purposes of this Policy, the relevant Controllers are:
Paddle.com Market Limited
of Judd House, 18-29 Mora Street, London, EC1V 8BT, UK
Paddle Payments Limited
of The Academy, 42 Pearse Street, Dublin, D02 YX88, Ireland
Paddle.com Inc.
of 3811 Ditmars Blvd, #1071 Astoria, New York, 11105-1803, USA
If you have any questions about this Policy, please contact us at privacy@paddle.com
V. Definitions
“Adequate Jurisdiction”
means a country or territory recognised as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under an adequacy decision made, from time to time, by (as applicable) (i) the Information Commissioner’s Office and/or under applicable UK law (including the UK GDPR), and/ or (ii) the European Commission under the EU GDPR.
“California Resident”
or
“Consumer”
means (1) every individual who is residing in the State of California for other than a temporary or transitory purpose, and (2) every individual who is domiciled in the State of California who is outside the state for a temporary or transitory purpose.
“Controller”
means the entity that decides how and why Personal Data is Processed. In many jurisdictions, the Controller has primary responsibility for complying with applicable data protection laws.
“Cookie”
means a small file that is placed on your device when you visit a website (including our Sites). In this Policy, a reference to a “Cookie” includes analogous technologies.
“Data Protection Authority”
means an independent public authority that is legally tasked with overseeing compliance with applicable data protection laws.
“EEA”
means the European Economic Area.
“GDPR”
means the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (“
EU GDPR
”); the Data Protection Act 2018 and the UK General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (as implemented by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 and the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc) (EU Exit) Regulations 2020) (the "
UK GDPR
"), as applicable;
“Merchant of Record”
means the licensed reseller of software and digital products and the business that is carried on by Paddle.
“Personal Data
” and
“Personal Information”
means information that is about any individual, or from which any individual is directly or indirectly identifiable, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that individual.
“Process”
,
“Processing”
or
“Processed”
means anything that is done with any Personal Data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction.
“Processor”
means any person or entity that Processes Personal Data on behalf of the Controller (other than employees of the Controller).
“Product”
means the Supplier’s software product(s) and/or digital content and any subsequent updates and upgrades thereto agreed to be resold or distributed by Paddle.
“Relevant Personal Data”
means Personal Data in respect of which we are the Controller.
“Sell”
has the meaning ascribed to it in section 1798.140 of the CCPA.
“Sensitive Personal Data”
means Personal Data about race or ethnicity, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, biometric data, physical or mental health, sexual life, any actual or alleged criminal offences or penalties, national identification number, or any other information that is deemed to be sensitive under applicable law.
“Sensitive Personal Information”
means Personal Information that reveals an Consumer’s social security, driver’s license, state identification card, passport number, account log-in, financial account, debit card or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account, precise geolocation, racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership or the contents of a Consumer’s mail, email, and text messages unless the business is the intended recipient of the communication; or genetic data
“Share”
means communicating orally, in writing, or by electronic or other means, a Consumer’s Personal Information to a third party for cross-context behavioural advertising, whether or not for monetary or other valuable consideration
“Site”
means any website operated, or maintained, by us or on our behalf.
“Standard Contractual Clauses”
means i) where the EU GDPR applies, the contractual clauses annexed to the European Commission's Implementing Decision 2021/914 of 4 June 2021 on standard contractual clauses for the transfer of personal data to third countries pursuant to Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council incorporating Module 1 (Controller to Controller transfers) (EU SCCs); and ii) where the UK GDPR applies, the template Addendum B.1.0 issued by the UK's Information Commissioner's Office and approved by Parliament in accordance with s119A of the Data Protection Act 2018 (UK Approved Addendum) and the accompanying Mandatory Clauses of the UK Approved Addendum, as updated from time to time and/or replaced by any further version published by the Information Commissioner's Office (UK Mandatory Clauses)
“Supplier”
means a party which has appointed Paddle to be its Merchant of Record and reseller of its Products
“UK”
means the United Kingdom
Sub-policy 4
https://impact.com/privacy-policy/:
About
About impact.com
Careers
Press releases
Sustainability
Contact
English
简体中文
日本語
Italiano
Français
Deutsch
Back
Sign in
Request a demo
Platform
Partnership management platform
impact.com handles the entire partnership life cycle across any partnership type
Creator
Discover, manage, and measure creator partnerships
Advocate
Engage, manage, reward, and track customer referrals
Brands
Publishers
Overview
Affiliates
Influencers and creators
Mobile apps
Content publishers
Premium news and media publishers
Partner with us
Agency partners
Agency directory
Technology partners
Technology partners directory
Referral partners
Insights
Resources
Blog
Customer stories
The Partnership Economy
Events
Partnerships Experience (iPX) Event
Partnerships Experience Academy
Sign up
Affiliate advertiser sign up
Affiliate publisher sign up
Talk to sales
Plans
About
About impact.com
Careers
Press releases
Sustainability
Contact
English
简体中文
日本語
Italiano
Français
Deutsch
Sign in
Request a demo
Privacy Policy
Last updated: August 13, 2021
We Are Impact
We are Impact Tech, Inc. (US) (formerly known as “Impact Radius, Inc.”), and the following affiliated companies (“Affiliates”): Impact Radius Limited (UK), Forensiq Limited (UK), Impact Radius SA Pty Ltd (Cape Town, SA), Impact and Impact Radius Pty Ltd (AU), Impact Tech Singapore PTE. LTD. and Impact Radius (Shanghai) Co., Ltd. We, and our Affiliates, are referred to as “Impact”.
Impact (“us”, “we”, or “our”) operates the website www.impact.com (“Website”) and provides Software-as-a-Service products to our business customers (collectively, the “Services”). This Privacy Policy informs you of our policies and practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, retention and erasure of any information relating to you that identifies you or by which you are identifiable (“Personal Information”) through the use of our Website, our Services, or that you otherwise provide to us. We will not use or share your Personal Information with anyone except as described in this Privacy Policy. We use your Personal Information for providing and improving the Website and Services. By using the Website, the Services, or providing Personal Information to us, you agree to our collection and use of your Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Who may use our Website, Services?
Although certain areas of the Website can be accessed by visitors generally, access to our Services is not provided to the general public. Only persons or entities that are eligible to enter into further agreement(s) with us (our “Clients”) may, with our permission, access non- public areas of our Website. All such Clients are businesses and only adults may access our Services. Your use of the Website and/or the Services will constitute your acknowledgment of and your consent to this Privacy Policy.
Personal Information Collection and Use
Clients
Our Clients that use our Services will be asked to provide us with certain Personal Information that can be used to contact or identify them (“Client Personal Information”). Some examples of when we collect Client Personal Information include when Client browses the Website; makes an inquiry on the Website; creates a user profile and password for Client’s Impact account; subscribes to Impact’s newsletters or other updates; signs up to attend and/or attends an event (such as a webinar or other online or in-person Impact hosted or sponsored event). Such Client Personal Information will include, but is not limited to, name, postal address, business email address, phone number and employer. We collect and use Client Personal Information to:
verify your identity;
administer and support your interaction with our Website and Services;
permit access to our Services;
provide Services to our Clients;
provide information and otherwise respond to your requests;
contact you periodically about other services and products we offer and with information on upcoming Impact events;
carry out marketing analysis, enhance, improve, maintain and debug our Website and the Services;
prevent fraudulent use of our Website and our Services, and to prevent or take actions against such fraudulent use or violation of our Terms of Use or applicable law;
tailor content and other aspects of your experience on and in connection with our Website and Services; and
for any other purposes that we may disclose to you at the point at which we request your Personal Information, and pursuant to your consent.
If you submit information through our Website to enquire about our Services, our organization, or an event or information posted on our Website, we will use such Personal Information to contact you in reply to your specific enquiry. You may be asked at that time whether you would like to be on our mailing list to receive news and updates about our company and Services. You may request to be removed from such mailing list at any time by using the “unsubscribe” function in our electronic communications or by contacting us as provided in the How to Contact Us section of this Privacy Policy.
Impact does not rent or sell Personal Information. Other than to your Client relationships through the Services, Impact does not disclose Personal Information about you with other people or companies that are not Affiliates, except under the following circumstances:
in order to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims;
when it is necessary to share information in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person; violations of Impact’s terms of use, any agreement with Impact or this Privacy Policy; or as otherwise required by law;
when Client Personal Information has been disclosed through legitimate and public channels (including, without limitation, news and press channels, governmental disclosure channels, etc.); and
if Impact sells any or all of its assets or their shareholders sell any or all of their shares to a third party in which case and subject always to compliance with applicable data protection legislation, you authorize that your Personal Information may be transferred to the buyer.
Our Clients’ Visitors
We may also process Personal Information of our Clients’ visitors and customers, and visitors to our Clients’ websites (or our Client’s application downloads) in performance of the Services on behalf of our Clients. In this context we are a “service provider” or “data processor” (as those terms are defined by applicable laws). This Personal Information may consist of Internet Protocol (“IP”) addresses, account or membership numbers (without a key to personally identify you), and/or email addresses, although, if it is our Clients sending email addresses to us, we request that our Clients encrypt email addresses prior to sending to us. We take security measures to protect all Personal Information, including by hashing IP addresses and further encrypting email addresses. We do not associate Personal Information with individuals and are subject to our Clients’ instructions regarding such collection and use of such Personal Information. As a vendor of our Clients, the bases for our collection and processing of Personal Information of their customers and visitors may be through consent obtained by our Client, our Client’s legitimate interests, or (in accordance with applicable law) a lawful business purpose.
Impact does not rent or sell Personal Information. Other than to our Client that is utilizing our Services (who is the “business” or “controller”), Impact does not disclose Personal Information about you with other people or companies that are not Affiliates, except under the following circumstances:
in order to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims;
when it is necessary to share information in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person; violations of Impact’s terms of use, any agreement with Impact or this Privacy Policy; or as otherwise required by law;
if Impact sells any or all of its assets or their shareholders sell any or all of their shares to a third party in which case and subject always to compliance with applicable data protection legislation, you authorize that your Personal Information may be transferred to the buyer; and
in the course of providing our Services, to our other Clients that you have relationships with.
Accessing and Correcting Your Personal Information
Client Personal Information is accessible through our Client online accounts (“Client Portals”). Clients are able to access their Personal Information to update and correct their Personal Information. If you no longer have access to the Client Portals, you may submit a request to remove Personal Information you provided to us by emailing a request to privacy@impact.com or contacting us by telephone or mail as further specified in the How to Contact Us section of this Privacy Policy. To protect your privacy and security, we will also take reasonable steps to verify your identity before removing your information.
We reserve the right to retain and use Client Personal Information as reasonably necessary to comply with our contractual obligations to you, and in order to comply with applicable laws, including privacy and/or data protection legislation.
If you are not a Client but have signed-up to receive information from us and would like to be removed from our mailing lists, you may use the “unsubscribe” instructions in our newsletters or electronic communications, or email such request to privacy@impact.com or contact us by telephone or mail as further specified in the How to Contact Us clause of this Privacy Policy.
If you are a customer of one of our Clients, or a visitor to their website (or have downloaded one of our Client’s applications), please contact the Client to request access to your Personal Information, or to correct or have such information deleted. If you do contact Impact, Impact does not associate the data that we process on behalf of our Clients with any particular individual, and Impact may not be able to verify whether we have Personal Information that belongs to you. See information below at How to Contact Us if you have questions regarding this policy or requests regarding your Personal Information.
Other Information
Log Data
Impact collects information that your browser or device sends whenever you visit our Website or use our Services, and we collect browser and device data as part of our Services for our Clients (“Log Data”). When we collect this of our Clients, this Log Data may include information such as your computer’s IP address, browser type, browser version, the pages of our Website or Services that you visit, the time and date of your visit, the time spent on those pages, your activity on those pages and other statistics. In addition, we may use third party services such as Google Analytics that collect, monitor and analyze this type of information in order to increase our Services’ functionality. These third-party service providers have their own privacy policies addressing how they use such information. When you access the Services by or through a mobile device, we may collect certain information automatically, including, but not limited to, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile device’s unique device ID, the IP address of your mobile device, your mobile operating system, the type of mobile Internet browser you use, your location information and other statistics. Please see the section regarding Location Information below regarding the use of your location information and your options.
The Log Data that we collect for our Clients, of visitors to their website or mobile applications, includes the visitor’s computer or mobile device IP address, browser type, browser version, and the ads that you interact with. If you are referred by one of our Clients to another’s website or application from interactions with the ads, we are passed information if you conclude an action there, such as the purchase of goods or services, signing-up for a newsletter or downloading an application. Impact does not receive your name, address, credit card, or other personally identifying information.
Location Information
In addition to Log Data, Impact may use and store information about Clients and Clients’ visitors’ location depending on the permissions that have been set on the relevant device. We use this information about our Clients to provide features of our Services and to improve and customize our Services. For our Clients’ visitors, Impact collects location information to attribute actions to particular Clients and for fraud prevention. You can enable or disable location services through your device settings.
Cookies
Cookies are files with a small amount of data, which may include an anonymous unique identifier. Cookies are sent to your browser from a web site and transferred to your device. For visitors to our Website and our Clients’ visitors, we use cookies to collect information in order to perform and improve our Website and Services. You can instruct your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. The “Help” feature on most browsers provide information on how to accept cookies, disable cookies or to notify you when receiving a new cookie. If you do not accept cookies, you may not be able to use some features of our Website or Services (or our Clients’ websites) and we recommend that you leave them turned on.
Integrations
For Clients, you may enhance the Services by enabling Impact integrations with third-party products. If you provide third-party account credentials to us, you understand some content and/or information in those accounts (“Third Party Account Information”) may be transmitted into your account with us, and that Third Party Account Information transmitted to our Services is covered by this Privacy Policy. Further, Impact software may request permissions to take actions on your behalf using your third-party account credentials.
Service Providers
We may employ third-party companies and individuals (our “agents”) to facilitate our Services, to provide the Services on our behalf, to perform Service-related services and/or to assist us in analyzing how our Services are used. Examples may include processing and storing data, delivering messages, processing credit card payments, analyzing data, providing marketing assistance, supplementing the information you provide us in order to provide you with better service, and providing customer service. These third parties have access to your Personal Information only to perform specific tasks on our behalf and are under written obligation not to disclose or use your Personal Information for any purpose other than those disclosed in this Privacy Policy. We do not transfer data to non-agent third parties, except as indicated above in “Personal Information Collection and Use”.
Notwithstanding any legal and contractual obligations between us and our agents, we remain potentially liable for any misuse of your Personal Information.
Your Options for Communications
For Clients and our Website visitors that sign-up to be contacted, Impact may use your Personal Information to contact you with newsletters, marketing or promotional materials and other information that may be of interest to you. You may opt out of receiving any, or all, of these communications from us by following the unsubscribe link or instructions provided in any email we send.
Security of Personal Information
The security of your Personal Information is important to us, and we strive to implement and maintain reasonable, commercially acceptable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information we store, in order to protect it from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure. However, please be aware that no method of transmission over the internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure and we are unable to guarantee the absolute security of the Personal Information we have collected from you.
International Transfer of Personal Information
Your Personal Information may be transferred to — and maintained on — computers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ from those in your jurisdiction, and in some cases be less stringent as compared to those of your own region. Our servers are located in data centers within the United States and other jurisdictions where we conduct business. Impact utilizes the EEA’s Standard Contractual Clauses for the purposes of transfers from the EEA to Impact and its Affiliates located outside of the EEA. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. Our Affiliates process Personal Information if necessary and appropriate for the business purposes (or legal basis) for which it was collected, and this may include if you have contacted the Affiliate directly for assistance or provide them directly with your information. Your consent to this Privacy Policy and your submission of Personal Information represents your agreement to those transfers.
Links to Other Sites
Our website and Services may contain links to other web sites or online locations that are not operated or controlled by us. If you click on a third-party link, you will be directed to that third party’s site. We strongly advise you to review the privacy policy of every online site or location you visit. We have no control over, and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third-party sites or services.
Children’s Privacy
Only persons who are age 18 or older have permission to access our Services. Our Services are not for access by anyone under the age of 18 (“Children”). We do not knowingly collect Personal Information from Children. If you are a parent or guardian and you learn that your Child has provided us with Personal Information, please contact us. If we become aware that we have collected Personal Information from a Child without verification of parental consent, we take steps to remove that information from our servers.
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
If the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) applies to your Personal Information, we confirm that we are a Service Provider for our Clients and that we do not sell your Personal Information (which under the CCPA includes information about your household). We only share such Personal Information as described in this policy. Impact processes your Personal Information for the purposes described in this policy, which include the following “business purposes” under the CCPA:
Security. Impact uses and may disclose information to detect, prevent and respond to security incidents, and for protecting against other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity. For example, to protect our Services, Impact may receive or disclose information about IP addresses that malicious actors have compromised.
Analytics & Services. Impact uses information for analytics to understand how our Services are used, as well as in the performance of our Services. We disclose data to our Clients pursuant to our agreements with them and their instructions, and this includes Personal Data of visitors to their websites and applications. If instructed by a Client to delete Personal Data, we delete the data or anonymized it (including automatically after a set period of time).
Maintenance of our Services. Impact uses Personal Information of our Clients to ensure that our Services are working as intended, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting bugs and other issues that we observe or that are reported to us.
Research and Development. Impact uses Personal Information of our Clients concerning their use of our Services and to develop new products, features and technologies that benefit our Clients. We do not use Personal Information of our Clients’ visitors for these purposes.
Use of Service Providers. Personal Information is processed by our Affiliates and third-party Service Providers to perform services on our behalf, in compliance with our Privacy Policy and other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we utilize cloud storage solutions to store data that we process.
Compliance. Impact also uses information to satisfy applicable laws or regulations, and discloses information in response to legal process or enforceable government requests, including to law enforcement.
If the CCPA is applicable to you and you have additional questions or requests related to your rights under the CCPA, see How to Contact Us below.
Retention and Deletion
Impact retains Personal Data only as long as is reasonably necessary for the performance of its Services, and Personal Data of our Clients’ visitors is automatically deleted or anonymized after ninety days. When Impact is requested to delete Personal Data prior to such automatic deletion, we follow a process to make sure that genuine requests are honored. This involves verifying that the requestor is the individual that is the data subject, or, if the request comes from a Client about its visitors, we delete Personal Data as instructed by our Client. Since we do not collect personally identifiable information of our Client’s visitors, if the information comes directly from a Client’s visitor we may not be able to verify that we have any such data, or to match a request with a particular Client.
When deleting data, the Personal Data is completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. If we have collected Personal Data about you from more than one Client, we will delete all instances of the Personal Data that we have at the time of the request (to the extent that we are able to verify and match such data). However, if you subsequently authorize or visit the same Client or another Client’s website or application, we will have processed your Personal Data in relation to such authorization or visit.
Privacy Policy Changes
We reserve the right to update or change our Privacy Policy at any time and you should check this Privacy Policy periodically. Your continued use of our website and/or the Services after we post any modifications to the Privacy Policy will constitute your acknowledgment of the modifications and your consent to abide and be bound by the modified Privacy Policy. If we make any material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you either through the email address you have provided us, or by placing a prominent notice on our website.
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or requests concerning your Personal Information, please contact us at:
privacy@impact.com
Impact Tech, Inc.
223 E. De La Guerra Street
Santa Barbara, CA 93101
USA
+1 (805)-324-6021
Sub-policy 5
http://www.trimble.com/privacy.aspx:
Skip to content
Our privacy commitment
At Trimble, we are committed to your privacy. We know that we must earn your trust—and keep it—every time you use Trimble products and services to transform the way the world works. To make good on that promise, we’ve created this Privacy Center, where you’ll learn all about our approach to your privacy.
The Trimble Office of Data Protection works to ensure that your personal data is collected, shared and handled the right way. Please read our complete Privacy Notice for details on what this means to you. We start with a commitment to:
Being transparent in how and when we collect - and use your personal data
Simplifying our policies so they are easy to understand
Making sure you have control of your data at all times
Trimble's products and services are intended for commercial use, however, we often make our products available for students as a part of their higher learning curriculum. Due to the increased focus on the security and protection of student information, we make sure that our privacy practices comply with federal and global regulations.
This Privacy Center and our Privacy Notice does not cover other organizations' sites that may be accessible via links from our sites. These sites have their own privacy policies and we encourage you to read them. We may often modify our Privacy Notice to update legal, technological and other developments. In that event, the changes will appear at this location.
Our customers have trusted us with their personal information for over 40 years, and we are committed to ensuring that you feel just as secure today. Your trust is our top priority. If you have a privacy question or concern, please contact Trimble Office of Data Protection.
ADDITIONAL RESOURCES
Your Privacy Choices (for US residents)
Privacy Notice
California Residents: Notice at Collection
Privacy Notice for Applicants in EU/EEA
Customer US Data Processing Addendum (information shared with Trimble)
Vendor and Partner US Data Processing Addendum (information shared by Trimble)
Canada Candidate and Employee Privacy Notice
US Candidate and Employee Privacy Notice
Trimble Connect - Security Whitepaper
Data Processing Agreement For Trimble Inc. and European Subsidiaries
Standard Contractual Clauses. Controller to Processor-SaaS Products and Platforms (GDPR)
Trimble Identity Personal Data Storage Settings
Trimble Supplemental Privacy Notice for Facial Imagery Data
Data Privacy Framework Notice (Commercial Data)
SketchUp Supplemental Privacy Notice
Trimble privacy form
SketchUp privacy preferences
Processing...
Please Wait.
We are migrating your Account information.
Attention
Unable to update shopping cart information. Please refresh the page to resolve the issue. If this issue persists, please
contact Trimble support.
Refresh Page
Attention
We tried to combine the products in your guest cart with your saved cart, but we encountered an issue while merging them. When choosing a subscription, please select either monthly or yearly as they cannot be combined. Kindly review your cart before proceeding to checkout.
Continue
Cart updated
Some items in your cart are not available for purchase in your region, so we removed them. Please review your cart before proceeding.
Items Removed:
undefined
OK
Attention
The software you are trying to purchase is not available in your country or region.
OK
Cart updated
The items in your cart have been updated for two reasons. Firstly, the prices now match the currency linked to your account address. Secondly, some items have been removed because they are not available for purchase in your region. Please review your cart before proceeding.
Items Removed:
undefined
OK
Cart updated
The items in your cart have been updated for two reasons. Firstly, you've added too many of one item to your cart. Secondly, some items have been removed because they are not available for purchase in your region. Please review your cart before proceeding.
Items Removed:
undefined
OK
Cart updated
The items in your cart have been updated for three reasons. Firstly, the prices now match the currency linked to your account address. Secondly, you've added too many of one item to your cart. Thirdly, some items have been removed because they are not available for purchase in your region. Please review your cart before proceeding.
Items Removed:
undefined
OK
Cart updated
Your currency has been changed to match the currency associated with your account address.
Continue
Cart updated
Your cart has been updated for two reasons. First, the prices now reflect the currency associated with your account address. Second, you've added too many of one item to your cart. Please review your cart before proceeding.
Continue
Cart updated
While combining the products in your guest cart with your saved cart, at least one item in your cart has exceeded the maximum allowable quantity. Please review and correct your cart before proceeding to checkout.
Continue